MIA  >  Archive  >  Mandel

 

[Ernest Mandel]


Ernest Mandel



THE INCONSISTENCIES OF “STATE-CAPITALISM”


------------------------------------------------------------------------

International Marxist Group Pamphlet, 8 Toynbee Street, London, E1,
England 1969
Transcribed & marked up by Roland Sheppard for the Ernest Mandel
Internet Archive, January, 2009.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

  > 

Introduction

A few words of explanation are necessary in introducing this pamphlet.
Michael Kidron, a leading theoretician of the “state capitalist”
tendency wrote a review of Ernest Mandel’s _MARXIST ECONOMIC THEORY_ in
issue number 36 of _International Socialism_ . The review was extremely
factional both in its language and its distortions.

Normally one tends to ignore shallow and vulgar criticisms, particularly
when they give the appearance of being hurriedly written (possibly
without having read the entire book). However crude though it was the
review had a thread running through it: a thread of assumptions, vulgar
concepts, and economic deterministic prejudices which represent the
ideology of the theory of state capitalism. In replying to Kidron and in
analyzing his arguments. Mandel was, therefore, able to examine the
economic basis of the theories of the _International Socialism_ group as
a whole in a comprehensive manner. Mandel does more than this: he
demonstrates how it is impossible to isolate theory from practice and
how, in fact the Menshevik theories of _International Socialism_ to a
very bad political practice.

Such an examination is long overdue. Among the many peculiarities of the
British political scene is the existence of a fairly large and active
group whose leadership believes in the theory of state capitalism. This
is both a historical and political anachronism. With rare exceptions,
those who have deserted the revolutionary Marxist position by refusing
to adopt the class line of unconditional defense of the workers states
against imperialism have long since lost any claim to be considered as
Marxists. In many cases, some of these groups have quite openly
denounced Marxism and renounced the dialectic. In most countries the
tendencies which have, at various times, come out in support of the
James Burnham-pioneered “third camp” position have decomposed into their
component parts: social democracy and anarchism. Others have become
small sects constantly splitting about such profound questions as the
actual date the Soviet Union became “state capitalist”.

In Britain owing mainly to the extreme sectarianism and ultra leftism of
the leadership of the _Socialist Labour League_ , the state capitalist
tendency has been given a renewed lease of life. By adapting themselves
to the “fall-out” from the SLL, principally by proclaiming the “easy
regime” of their organization, they have tended to pick up former
members of the SLL who wished to remain active in left-wing politics but
who had suffered a series of traumatic shocks in the face of the SLL
version of democratic centralism. The absence until recently, of a
viable section of the _Fourth International_ in Britain has been, of
course, another important reason for the relative success of
_International Socialism_ .

Some of us predicted that its looseness would soon begin to catch up
with it and that I.S. would be faced with organizational and political
crises. That this has happened is abundantly clear. But a considerable
number of young revolutionaries have been made sour and cynical as they
passed through this organization and in the building of a revolutionary
party these casualties cannot be afforded. Because the building of such
a party is an important and urgent task which faces the revolutionary
left in Britain.

The task of combating the theories of state capitalism is, therefore, a
vital one. This pamphlet examines and demolishes these theories in a
systematic manner and from the viewpoint of revolutionary Marxism. At
the same time the pamphlet should be seen as a creative contribution
towards the theory of bureaucracy and the transitional forms between
capitalism and socialism. _The lnternational Marxist Group_ is proud to
publish it.

 

Michael Kidron’s “_Maginot Marxism_ ”[1]cannot be considered a serious
criticism of “_Marxist Economic Theory_ ”. It takes up only three
chapters out of eighteen and even these in an unsystematic and haphazard
manner. It does not try to understand, let alone refute, the internal
logic of the book, or any of the contributions it makes to the
development of Marxist theory. Nevertheless it denies that any such
contributions are contained in the book at all. But if it does not
represent a serious critique of contemporary Marxist economic theory, it
strikingly reveals most of the contradictions into which adherents of
the theory of “state capitalism” enmesh themselves, when they have to
tackle problems of economic analysis on a larger historic scale. A
discussion of Kidron’s article is therefore useful, less as an
“anticritique” than as a starting platform for a critique of the “state
capitalist” theory.

 

“The Central Capitalist Dynamic”

Kidron starts out with an amazing accusation: _Marxist Economic Theory_
is “unsure of the central capitalist dynamic”. This would be indeed an
unforgivable sin for a Marxist, because “the central capitalist dynamic”
is precisely what Marxist economic theory is about.

So in order to teach us a lesson, Kidron starts explaining what this
“central capitalist dynamic” is in his opinion. First he says that what
is peculiar to capitalism, among class societies, is the fact that
“there is no central, public arrangement to ensure that the process (of
pumping a surplus product systematically from the mass of producers)
will go on in an orderly, continuous and predictable way. Key choices
about the deployment of resources are left to individual capitals, big
and small, public and private”. Then he continues to say that under
capitalism “growth is the ultimate compulsion,” “the primacy of growth
is essential to Marx’s model of the system at work”.

Unfortunately for Kidron, both “definitions” of the “central capitalist
dynamic” get him immediately into trouble if considered in the light of
economic history. In most class societies, there is no “central public
arrangement” to ensure that the process of accumulation goes on “in an
orderly, continuous and predictable way”. On each medieval _demesne,_ it
is true, a serf was forced to deliver say half of his output to the
noble lord. But what was sowed and reaped on each _demesne,_ what (if
any) surplus was left over after the lord’s consumption needs Were
covered, how much local, regional, national, or international trade was
made possible as a result of this surplus, how much (if any) development
of productive technique took place, was not only not “ensured” in an
“orderly, continuous and predictable way” but was even much more
disorderly, discontinuous and unpredictable, than under capitalism. To
think that Alexander the Great (slave society), the Emperor of China
(Asian mode of production) or Charlemagne (feudalism) were in possession
of some mysterious “central, public arrangement” to ensure that the
process of surplus product extraction went on in an “orderly, continuous
and predictable way” in the societies they dominated, is a complete
misreading of history. In fact, under precapitalist class society,
interruptions in this process were much more numerous and much more
disastrous for all involved than under capitalism (one has to think only
of the regular recurrence of famines).

With his second definition, Kidron has no more luck than with his first
one. The “primacy of growth” is not only true for capitalism; it is true
for several other historic formations. The transition from dry to large
scale irrigated agriculture, sometime between the 35th and the 30th
century B.C., triggered off a tremendous process of growth which led us
in the course of no more than 400 years from small isolated villages to
large cities, extended international trade and the building of empires.
The victory of the socialist world revolution tomorrow will also trigger
off tremendous economic growth (and, perish the thought, even
large-scale “accumulation”), unless of course we conceive of world
socialism with two-thirds of mankind condemned to the miserable standard
of living they are “enjoying” today.

So the very charge raised by Kidron against us boomerangs against him
with a loud bans, right at the outset of his article. It is Kidron who
quite plainly shows himself unable to define the’ specific
characteristic of the capitalist mode of production. It is Kidron who is
unable to define any “central dynamic” of capitalism which sets it apart
from all other social formations in the history of mankind. And this is
all the more amazing, because “_Capital_ ” and all Marx’s economic
writings are built upon precisely that _differentia specifica_ which, in
all modesty, we claim to have fully understood and made the cornerstone
of _Marxist Economic Theory_ as well.

It is sufficient to open “_Capital_ ” and to read chapter I of the first
vol. to understand what constitutes this “central dynamic” of the
capitalist mode of production. Capitalism is the only form of class
society in which _commodity production becomes generalized,_ in which
all elements of production (land, labor power, labor instruments. etc.)
become commodities [2] Generalization of commodity production creates a
constantly growing but also constantly uncertain and changing anonymous
market, and this implies in turn universal competition. It is this
universal competition between separate capitals (owned by separate
capitalists) which is the main driving force for the accumulation of
capital, the only means to systematically reduce production costs,
because any individual capitalist who stays behind in this race will be
pushed out of the market through being forced to sell at a loss (or at
too small a profit). Capitalism is therefore a mode of production in
which the generalization of commodity production unleashes a historic
process of accumulation of capital, which is in turn a constant (be it
discontinuous) growth of _commodity_ production, of production of
_exchange values_ and reinvestment of surplus value.

Starting from this definition we can easily distinguish capitalism from
previous class societies “with no central arrangement to ensure that the
process wilt go in an orderly, continuous and predictable way,” as well
as from other societies where there is a primacy of growth”. Capitalism
is the only society in which economic growth takes the form of a general
growth of commodity production, whereas economic growth in the period in
which irrigation agriculture became generalized was essentially growth
in the output of use-values (as it will be under socialism). Disorders,
discontinuity in accumulation, and unpredictable developments in
pre-capitalist class societies arose essentially from sudden decline in
production, i.e. _underproduction of use-values_ (famine, epidemics,
population decline, decreasing fertility of the soil, wars, etc.);
whereas disorders, discontinuity in accumulation and unpredictable
developments under capitalism arise from _overproduction of
exchange-values,_ i.e. from the contradictions of commodity production
(which most of the time are caused not by a decline but by an increase
in the production of use-values).

 

Competition, economic compulsion and “psychological mechanisms”

It is true that Kidron uses, in passing, the concept of “competition”
which would normally imply the notion of commodity production. He
writes: “The behavior of individual capitals is narrowly determined by
the competition between them … If an individual capital did not grow, it
would ultimately be unable to afford the rationalization and innovation
with which to meet those that did, or unable to ride as successfully the
sudden changes in market conditions which are part of the system. For an
individual capital growth is the ultimate compulsion” (p. 33). We fully
agree with this description. But a moment’s thought will show that this
is true only if one assumes a generalization of commodity production and
competition between individual owners and sellers of commodities.[3]

“Competition” between different feudal landowners for the occupation of
“land without a master” or the submission of free peasants;
“competition” between Rome and Carthage; “competition” even between
merchant cities (e.g. between ‘Venice and Byzantium, or between the
Dutch and the Hansa towns) _does not_ lead to the results which Kidron
just described. Under such conditions, the failure to “accumulate
capital” does not make a feudal _demesne “_ unable to ride as
successfully the sudden changes in market conditions which are part of
the system”, precisely because sudden changes in market conditions are
_not “_ part of the system”, as long as the means of production have not
become commodities and are not submitted therefore to constant and
unpredictable technological changes. Lack of growth of merchant capital
is no barrier to success, when supply as well as demand are more or less
narrowly limited, as a result of limited markets, traditional
techniques, and relatively stagnant output. Under such conditions,
“competition” does not lead to _productive_ reinvestment of capital, and
especially not to its reinvestment in industry. Accumulation of capital
takes the form of hoarding, of usury capital, of buying up of land.

So the _rationale_ of capitalism can be understood only under conditions
of _constantly expanding commodity production,_ of a constantly
expanding and insecure market, and of firms, or producing units, facing
that anonymous market independently from each other and competing for
larger and more profitable shares of the market. If one abandons that
specific form of _competition — capitalist_ competition, that is — then
any rational explanation of the drive to accumulate becomes impossible,
and we are left with mystifying tautological formulas like “capital must
accumulate because it is its function to accumulate”, or “the
bureaucracy is the personification of capital in its purest form”. But
if we assume generalized and constantly expanding commodity production,
we assume also the absolute need to realize the exchange-values of these
commodities, in order to accumulate capital. It is the specific nature
of commodity production that a ship full of shoes cannot be transformed
into additional quantities of leather, and wages for additional
manpower, if it is not sold, i.e., transformed into money. Innumerable
capitalists have suffered a fate worse than death because they happened
to forget that simple little rule which Kidron, curiously enough, seems
to consider a special idiosyncrasy of Mandel’s. Because capital is tied
to commodity production, and to commodity production only, because no
capitalist production is possible on the basis of producing use-values.
Money is indeed the initial and final form of capital, towards which the
whole of economic activity is directed. And for that same reason,
capital accumulation, the final money form of capital, and the
capitalists’ thirst for profit, far from being distinctive from each
other-the one “behavior of capital”, and the other “social and
psychological mechanisms which ensure that behavior” are just different
synonymous expressions of the same basic _economic compulsion,_
determined by the structure of capitalist society.

There cannot be the slightest doubt that Marx understood the working of
capital exactly in this way, and in this way only[4] . For Marx,
“capital” could only exist in the form of different capitals[5] ;
otherwise, there was no more compulsion to accumulate. Consequently,
capital could only exist in the form of “different capitalists”, i.e., a
social class constituted so that each part of it was, by compelling
economic interest, tied to the survival of “its” own unit of production
or circulation. Consequently, the “thirst for profit” of each part of
that class, and the “drive to capital accumulation”, are identical, the
second one being only realizable through the first (the attempt at
profit maximization of each unit or firm).

For Marx capital implies commodity production, i.e., the need to sell
commodities before one can reconstitute and expand capital. “Returning
to the money form of capital”, “thirst of profit” (i.e., drive to profit
maximization) and compulsion to accumulate capital are therefore exactly
identical expressions, which uncover the basic tissue of capitalist
society and capitalist mode of production: a dialectical unity between a
class structure _(based upon the interests of the ruling class),_ a
specific mode of production _(generalized commodity production, which,
be it repeated again, implies that labor power has become a commodity,
which implies therefore the existence of a proletarian class, forced to
sell its labor power),_ and a specific set of laws of motion resulting
from them _(capital accumulation and its contradictions, among them, of
course, the class struggle)._

Kidron’s attempt to unravel this tissue is based on semantic
misunderstandings, which ultimately reflect lack of clarity of what
capitalism really means. To say that the capitalists’ “thirst for
profit” (or the firm’s tendency to profit maximization) is a “social and
psychological mechanism” through which the behavior of a mythical
abstraction called “capital”, divorced from social classes, is assured,
and that these “mechanisms” are common to all class societies, is
committing a gross confusion between _individual psychological
motivations-on_ which much discussion is possible-and _economic
compulsions,_ to which social classes are ruthlessly submitted in a
given social framework (under the impact of a given mode of production).
The capitalists’ “thirst for profit” is not a matter of individual
psychological motivation at all; it is an economic compulsion, as Kidron
should infer from his own description of capitalist competition. And it
is just not true that this “thirst for profit” is “common to all class
societies”. On the contrary, all class societies in which the social
surplus product took essentially the form of use-values produced ruling
classes which had no “thirst for profit” whatsoever, but only “thirst”
for luxury consumption, and which went so far as to systematically
destroy the very sources of “profit” (i.e. of _capital_ accumulation) in
their thirst for consumption.

According to Kidron, Mandel confuses “social control” and its “form”.
This argument is especially unfortunate, because Marx himself made
explicitly the point that it is precisely the specific _form_ of the
social surplus product which implies the dynamic of the system[6] .
Kidron seems to be under the impression that if precapitalist class
societies did not know the kind of growth which capitalism witnesses, it
was because the ruling classes had “everything under control”. We were
then presumably living under “economic law and order”. The truth is of
course quite different. Precapitalist ruling classes had no economic
compulsion to capital accumulation because the form of the social
surplus product was essentially that of use-values, and unlimited
accumulation of use values is economically irrational and meaningless:
the limit to economic growth was more or less given by the limit of
luxury consumption of the ruling class and its retainers (including of
course conspicuous consumption, _vide:_ the pyramids).

Acceleration of economic growth could start on a tremendous scale only
when the social surplus product took the _form_ of money, which could be
used not only to acquire consumer goods, but also to buy land, means of
production and labor power, and when the generalization of commodity
production, the creation of an expanding market, and the appearance on
this market of independent producers and sellers of commodities, made it
not only profitable but indispensable to reinvest money in expanding
production. It is this _economic compulsion for a social class to
productive accumulation of the social surplus product-which_ was only
possible because this surplus product had taken the form of money, had
become surplus value— which created capitalism. And for Marxists, the
tremendous revolutions involved in these transformations are
inconceivable without a social class whose interests must be served —
and indeed were served — through them; because for Marxists, unlike for
vulgar “economic determinists”, no economic transformations are possible
without social forces imposing them, and no social forces impose such
transformations if these are against their basic economic interests.

That’s what Marx taught about capital, capitalism, the capitalist class
(and incidentally. more generally about historical materialism. That’s
what we tried to illustrate, with new empirical data, and at least in
the historical parts of _Marxist Economic Theory, in_ a more extended
way than Marx had found time to do. We don’t say of course: this is
true, because Marx said so. We only say: Marx truly said this. Kidron
can either claim to approve Marx’s analysis of capital — and then he has
to withdraw his clumsy criticism of our dealing with the “central
dynamic” of the system. Or he has the perfect right to challenge Marx —
but then he must come up with an analysis which covers the whole history
of capital, from its inception till today, and which distinguishes this
system from all other modes of production, either previous or ulterior,
and that he hasn’t done so far. Perhaps he is, after all, afraid that he
will look a bit silly pretending to know better than Marx what is the
real essence of “_Capital_ ”…

 

The Laws of Motion of Capitalism and the “Pure Model”

This is all the more important as Marx himself has clearly defined what
method he used in his analysis of capitalism. In his preface to the
second edition of “Capital”, he quotes approvingly an article in a
Russian magazine which states that the scientific value of his analysis
lies “in the unveiling of the particular laws which regulate the
origins, existence, development and death of a given social organism,
and its replacement by another and higher one”. Marx adds to this
quotation that the author of that magazine article has most correctly
(“treffend”) defined his method, which is the dialectical one.

This means that no understanding of capitalism is possible without the
understanding of general laws of motion, which explain both its origins,
its development through its successive stages, and its final and
inevitable decline and fall. To say, as all “fashionable” professors of
economics do today, that Marx discovered laws of motion which were
correct “only for 19th century capitalism”, but that they don’t apply
any more today, means to say that Marx was completely wrong. His
ambition was not at all to analyze and given limited period of the
history of capital; his ambition was to explain its whole history, from
its beginning to its death.

Kidron, under the obvious influence of “fashionable” (i.e. bourgeois)
economics, moves around this hot stew, quite unsure of himself, and does
not dare either to eat or to refuse it. The “solution” with which he
comes up is that in Marx’s “pure” system, the laws of motion apply, but
that real life is quite different from this “pure” system, and in real
life Marx’s laws of motion do not apply “completely” (or even not at
all, which is at least implied in some of Kidron’s remarkable statements
about contemporary capitalism).

Let us first state that Kidron’s way of summarizing the laws of motion
of capitalism contains several “classical” oversimplifications,
fashionable in academic circles and in the Kautsky — school of
vulgarized Marxism; this is no accident, as we shall presently note.
Kidron will have a hard time finding any evidence in Marx’s “Capital”
that there is a tendency for labor power to decline in absolute terms
under capitalism; that “booms become progressively less profitable and
shorter: slumps more lasting and severe”[7] . But be this as it may, let
us now follow Kidron’s argumentation of how the absence of a “closed
system” of capital upsets the workings of the laws of motion of
capitalism discovered by Marx:

“The model is a closed system, in which all output flows back as inputs
in the form of investment goods or of wage goods. There are no leaks.

“Yet in principle a leak could insulate the compulsion to grow from its
most important consequences . . . If ‘capital-intensive’ goods were
drawn off, the rise would be slower and depending on the volume and
composition of the leak-could even stop or be reversed. In such a case
there would be no decline in the average rate of profit, no reason to
expect increasingly severe slumps, and so on.

“Capitalism has never formed a closed system in practice. Wars and
slumps have destroyed immense quantities of ouput. Capital exports have
diverted and frozen other quantities for long stretches of time.

“A lot, since World War II, filtered out in the production of arms. Each
of these leaks bas acted to slow the rise in the overall organic
composition and the fall in the rate of profit.” (p.33).

A truly remarkable constant confusion between use-values and
exchange-values, between physical goods produced (or destroyed) and
their counterpart in form of value of commodities, appears throughout
these lines. It is worthy of inclusion in a textbook simply to show what
misunderstanding a lack of clarity on the dual nature of the commodity
necessarily leads to.

What seems to lie at the basis of this whole conception is some vulgar
theory of over-production, according to which it is a glut of physical
goods which is at the basis of all capitalism’s evil. Slumps result from
too many consumer goods; increased organic composition of capital and
declining rate of profit result from too many investment goods (too many
machines). When there are “leaks”, and other goods are produced instead
of these, or, even better, when these goods are destroyed, then there is
rejoicing in the sky of Capital, and laws of motion are magically put
out of action.

Kidron forgets that what capitalism is about is the accumulation of
capital (i.e., stored _value)_ and not the disposal of the use-values of
commodities. A certain proportion of these must, of course, fill
physical needs and give production its needed physical material. But
these physical conditions of reproduction arc only material
_preconditions_ for the successful realization of capital accumulation.
They don’t guarantee in themselves either the realization of that
process, nor its realization under conditions where the laws of motion
of the system apply, apply only partially or, presumably for Kidron,
don’t apply at all. These conditions depend exclusively on the
composition, exchange, valorization and reproduction of _capital as
value._

The example of slumps clarifies this easily. A slump is not primarily a
destruction of “immense quantities of output” (of physical goods).
Sometimes, this destruction does not happen at all; and even when it
does happen, it is only a secondary side-effect of what is the real
meaning of slumps (and, incidentally, also their objective _function_ in
the dynamics of capitalism): the _destruction of capital as value,_
through massive depreciation of stocks of goods, or fixed capital (parts
of which even lose all their value: machines are turned into scrap iron,
etc.) and of ‘fictitious capital’. Whether this essential process is
accompanied by physical destruction of goods is immaterial.

Because slumps are destroyers of capital and not of “output”, they tend
to lower the organic composition of capital[8] , and allow a rise in the
rate of profit which sets off a new cycle of increased “Capital
investment, boom, rising organic composition of capital, decline in the
rate of profit, which eventually leads to a new decline in production,
etc. There is therefore no need at all to discover any “leak” in the
“closed system” to “explain” why slumps temporarily reverse the trend
towards increased organic composition of capital and declining rate of
profit. On the contrary, this “safetyvalve” is built-in in the “dosed
system”, as Marx himself clearly stated and as we explicitly repeated
ill _Marxist Economic Theory[9] ._

The same thing is true for (capital exports. This process can only be
constructed as a “leak” from the “closed system”, if this “closed
system” is viewed as being established in a single country, surrounded
by a world outside of the realm of capitalism — a construction which is
completely alien to Marx’s “model”. Once the “closed system” of capital
is viewed as an international system (the capitalist world market), then
capital exports are neither a “diversion” nor a “freezing” of output (?)
for “long stretches of time”, but simply the manifestation of the
_basic_ law of motion of capitalism, the tendency of capital to flow
from branches, regions, areas, countries with lower, to those with
higher rates of profits. It is no accident that Kidron does not even
mention this law of motion in his description of the model. And such a
flow (be it “export” or not) of course counteracts the trend towards a
declining rate of profit, inasmuch as it leads to capital investments
with a lower organic composition of capital or (and) a higher rate of
surplus value. Again, the counteracting tendency does not represent any
“leak”, but is built-in-in the “midel” as such, and clearly stated by
Marx himself.

Kidron’s third “leak” is represented by wars. The same infusion between
use-values and exchange-values, between physical goods and capital,
occurs here. All wars destroy physical goods; but whether they destroy
capital is not so obvious nor so automatic.

In order to destroy capital, they must not only destroy consumer goods,
including durable ones like houses, but also destroy industrial
equipment to a larger degree than is newly built. Wars, it should not be
forgotten, not only can _destroy_ capital but also can lead to a
tremendous _increase of capital accumulation (as happened, for example,
in the USA both during the first and second world war)._ Often the two
processes occur side by side _(like in Britain during- the second world
war),_ and only if the first process is larger than the second one is
there real capital destruction _(i.e., does overall capital accumulation
become negative)._ We have described the mechanics of this process of
contracted reproduction under war economy ill _Marxist Economy Theory;_
incidentally one of the examples of “fresh exploration” which Kidron
somehow managed to miss in the book. Kidron seems to labor under the
impression that wars and war production are “unproductive” and “destroy
capital” because weapons are “destructive goods”. He forgets that a
manufacturer of tanks, munitions and fighter planes makes a huge profit,
uses a large part of it to accumulate capital (i.e. _to buy new
machinery and to hire new men_ ) and that this represents a process of
capital accumulation identical to the similar steps embarked upon by a
manufacturer of tinned milk or by a firm producing turbines.

We have now arrived at Kidron’s fourth “leak”: arms production.
According to him, it represents a “drain”, and “being a
capital-intensive drain, it will have a restraining effect on the
tendency of the organic composition to rise” (pp. 33-34). Why arms
production is a “drain”, and why it has a restraining effect on the
tendency of the organic composition of capital to rise, remains an
absolute mystery.

The whole construction is completely artificial and misses the main “law
of motion” of capital accumulation altogether. For arms production is
not conducted on some mysterious planet Mars, but on this wicked planet
of ours; it is 110t conducted under conditions of some mysteriously
unknown mode of production, but under “normal” and “classical”
capitalism, with a constant flow of capital between _all_ sectors of
profitable investment, including arms production. So the calculation of
an “organic composition of capital” in the arms industry, separate and
apart from that of the “civilian sector”, is completely meaningless to
establish the trend of the average rate of profit, which results
precisely from the _social average_ between _all_ sectors, including the
arms sector. What Kidron would have to prove, to show that the effect of
capitalist arms production is to weaken or to stop the tendency to a
declining rate of profit, is that the average social organic composition
of capital (including of course the arms sector itself) has become lower
than it would have been if that arms production sector would not have
existed. And that conclusion just does not make any sense, if one
assumes that the organic composition of capital in the arms production
sector is actually higher and not lower than the average organic
composition of capital in the “civilian” production sector, because it
is nearly entirely situated in the “capital intensive” sector of heavy
industry11[10] .

Kidron’s assumption could only imply an element of truth if the average
organic composition of capital would be actually lower ill the armament
sector than it is in the other sectors. In that case, of course, strong
expansion of a sector with lower organic composition of capital would
lower the social average organic composition of capital and thereby
successfully counteract the tendency of the rate of profit to fall. But
this hypothesis — which Kidron would be the first one to reject! — does
not correspond to reality. And even if it would, it would not represent
a “drain” but only a particular manifestation of the same basic law of
motion of capitalist accumulation of the “pure” model, which we
described above.

Kidron would have spared himself much confusion, if instead of talking
about “leaks” and “drains”, he would have started from the
key-difficulty which monopoly capitalism has encountered for
three-quarters of a century. This is _not_ the difficulty of disposing
of _surplus goods_ (thereby welcoming any turn in development which
would lead to a sudden decline in the “surplus” of consumer goods and
investment goods), but the difficulty of disposing of _surplus capital,_
which derives from the very nature of _monopoly capital[11] ._ Thence
both the drive to increasing capital exports, and the drive towards arms
production. The economic function of arms production is to provide
additional fields of investment for capital surplus, not to reduce the
increase in the organic composition of capital and/or the declining rate
of profit. Its overall effect-if it is large- will be to ensure a higher
rate of overall growth (obviously. because the alternative would be not
to use at all the capital invested in arms production) and to reduce the
volume of investment and output fluctuations (because arms production.
unlike “civilian” production, generally does not decline in phases of
recession). But whether all this leads to a rise or to a decline in the
average rate of profit depends on other circumstances (e.g., on the
effects of arms production on the rate of surplus value), not on the
nature of arms production as a “drain”.

 

Contemporary Capitalism and Vulgar Economics

So Kidron’s whole construction of “leaks” and “drains” collapses as an
explanation of why the laws of motion of capitalism don’t apply today.
He is faced with the same dilemma as all those who call themselves
Marxists: either he has somehow to accept that there are “tendencies”
which do not manifest themselves _(which is of course something
different from saying that there are tendencies which don’t manifest
themselves permanently or without counteracting tendencies),_ or he has
to have a fresh look at reality, try to shake off impressionism, and to
find behind superficial phenomena and doctored “statistics” more
fundamental economic processes which do, after all, correspond to Marx’s
laws of motion.

That’s what we tried, in _Marxist Economic Theory_ and subsequent
writings, and we think we can prove our case. As we have shown, between
1869 and 1919, the output of producers’ goods increased more than twenty
times in the USA, whereas the output of consumer goods only increased
twelve times. Between 1919 and 1964, the output of machinery and
instruments in the USA, rose from 14.1 % to 20.5’/6 of total
manufacturing production. Again, the output of machinery increased
threefold between 1947 and 1968, whereas total industrial production
rose by 250 % in the same period. So one might infer that for one
century the output of department I has indeed grown more rapidly than
the output of department II, which implies that there is a definite
tendency for the organic composition of capital to rise[12] , and that,
from a long term point of view, this tendency is neither stopped nor
reversed during the last decades (although it obviously slows down
percent wise. when the _absolute_ volume of department I reaches a
higher and higher level. The same _rate_ of growth of the organic
composition of capital would require, starting from a certain absolute
volume of constant capital and given the average rate of capital
accumulation, an _absolute decline_ in variable capital or in output of
department II—which has obviously not been the case, and could not be
the case given the existing relationship of forces between Capital and
labor in the U.S.A.).

Now given the evidence of a long-term trend of rise in the organic
composition of capital, given the complete lack, of evidence of any
long-term rise in the rate of surplus value proportional to it, one can
only conclude either that there has to be long-term decline in the
average rate of profit, or that Marx’s labor theory of value does not
hold any more _(that constant capital is somehow mysteriously “producing
surplus value”),_ and in that case, the whole of Marx’s economic theory
collapses. Let us repeat again that we are not talking of a couple of
years here and a couple of years there, but of long-term trends. Kidron
makes a caricature of our analysis when he says that for us “the real
thing “ becomes as simple as the model [13]. But surely, a model which
has no relation whatsoever to the “real thing” is a wrong model, I would
presume . . . And the denial of any longterm decline in the rate of
profit leads Kidron smack into vulgar economics accepting the labor
theory of value with one hand and denying it with another.

In studying capitalist statistics on “rates of profit”, one has to take
a whole series of precautions, in order to translate them into Marxist
terms.

In the first place, the average rate of profit Marxist economic theory
is concerned with the rate of profit on the flow of current production
(pl/c+v, in which is the fraction of the total capital stock actually
used up in annual output and not the rate of profit of the _stock_ of
total capital investment (pl/K+M, in which K is the value of all fixed
capital invested and M the value of total circulation capital available
in capitalist industry). Most statistics-and balance sheets of
capitalist firms calculate profit rates on the stock and not on the
flow-and the difference can be quite striking.

In, the second place. Marx’s laws of motions are concerned with _value_
production, not with _price_ calculations. It takes a lot of analytical
labor to deduct from national income and national expenditure statistics
the sum-total of surplus value produced by industrial labor. Part of
that surplus- value is appropriated by other sectors of capital
_(banking capital, commercial capital, capital invested in the service
industries, etc.)_ through the market _(i.e., through the purchase of
“services” by the manufacturing firms, which appears in the
balance-sheets as “production costs”, or through the sale of commodities
below their prices of production),_ is thus deducted from the income of
industrial capital, and is not included in the category “profit of
industry before taxes”. If this part of surplus value, while increasing
in absolute figures, is declining in relation to “industrial profits”,
then the rate of growth of surplus value as compared with the rate of
growth of current capital expenditure might be in fact lower than
appears from the statistical “series before taxes”, and the average rate
of profit might in fact be declining although the series “profit before
taxes” does not show so.

In the third place, ever since corporation taxes became “burdensome”, a
whole new “service industry” for doctoring balance-sheets has arisen.
Most Marxist commentators have insisted especially upon the
profit-concealing function of this doctoring (e.g., camouflaging
important part of surplus value as constant capital consumption, through
the method of accelerated depreciation)[14] . They seem to have
forgotten that this also implies a systematic under-valuation of capital
itself, in the first place an under-valuation of the total capital
stock-which is all the more formidable because it becomes cumulative-but
also an under-valuation of current capital expenditure (part of which is
marked down in the books as “current costs of repair”, another part of
which does not appear at all, because the value has already been
“written off” before). Now if the real value of capital is much higher
than appears in the balance sheets, then of course statistical series
which appear to show uncertain fluctuations of the rate of profit, or
even an increase of that rate, can actually hide a long-term tendency of
a declining rate of profit[15] .

All this being said, do the statistical series really warrant any
conclusion that the trend towards a declining average rate of profit has
somehow been reversed by contemporary capitalism? Kidron’s own series,
whatever may be its serious shortcomings indicated above, actually prove
the opposite. In order to interpret them, we have to understand that the
rate of profit-oscillation works on two wavelengths, so to speak. They
work within the span of each cycle, going up in the boom and going down
under conditions of recessions; and they work in longer-range periods,
tending to reach peaks, during booms, which have a tendency to become
lower _(which does not mean naturally that each boom must have
automatically a lower maximum rate of profit than the previous one had.
Increases in the rate of surplus value can momentarily offset the
effects of increases in the organic composition of capital)._ One can
dispute the first type cyclical decline only if one disputes the
inevitability of cyclical variations of capitalist production at all;
and one cannot dispute this inevitability neither in fact _(recessions
have occurred in the USA economy in_ 1949, 1953, 1957, 1%0, _and one is
starting right now)_ nor in theory _(it flows precisely from the
fragmentation of productive resources between different owners. i.e.,
from the existence of “different capitals”, viz., from capitalist
competition without which as we have seen above, capitalism cannot be
conceived)._

But what about the long-term trends of the rate of profit? Kidron’s
statistics show that on “net working capital” the rate of profit
declined from 49 % in the boom year 1950 to 43.6 % in the next peak boom
year 1955. 38.4% in the next peak boom year 1959 and an average of 43.1
% for the three boom years 1965, 1966 and 1967. There is no “linear”
decline, but the tendency towards decline is quite clear.

The same applies to the two main European capitalist countries, West
Germany and Great Britain. In West Germany, net profits as a percentage
of net capital worth declined for all industry from 20.9% in 1951
toUS.5% in 1955, 18.4% in 1960 and 14.9% in 1965 (each peak years of the
cycle; the rates for the intermediary years are each time lower than the
peaks). And for Britain, the _Financial Times’ “_ Annual Trend of
Industrial Profit” series indicate a similar trend: for all industrial
companies, the rate of profit as against net assets declines from an
average of 9.3% for the 1952-1960 period to an average of 7.8% for the
1961-1965, and an average of 6.9% for the 1965-1968 period[16] .

So Kidron is wrong when he assumes that “’nothing beyond the forties
could sustain Mandel’s thesis … “

It is true, that _Marxist Economic Theory_ does not treat in a
systematic way the problem of the sharp rise in the rate of growth of
the capitalist economy after world war II, a rate of growth which is now
declining — as we foresaw correctly since the early sixties, and as the
very same issue of “International Socialism” which prints Kidron’s
critique also confirms (p. 31). The reason for this does not lie in our
“maginot Marxism” (it is not difficult to explain that rise with Marx’s
analytical tools). It lies simply in the fact that most of _Marxist
Economic Theory_ was written in the late fifties, i.e. more than ten
years ago, when many of the postwar trends were not yet clear.

The further development of what we believe to be the explanation of the
peculiarities of contemporary capitalism” can be found in a few of our
later writings[17]. Briefly, we think that what we have been witnessing
is a third industrial revolution, similar in effect to the second one
which ushered in the phase of monopoly capitalism in the last quarter of
the nineteenth century. We believe that each of the three industrial
revolutions which capitalism witnessed till now have had a similar
effect of pushing the rate of investment and of growth upward during a
first series of cycles, while inevitably preparing thereby the grounds
for a later “long cycle” with a much lower rate of growth. We believe,
in other words, that the cyclical movement of the rate of profit is
three-fold: inside each 5 to 10 years cycle (first up, then down);
between the peaks of several cycles constituting together a long-term
period of 20-25 years (generally down); and between several long-term
periods (more erratic, but downward in the “secular” sense: obviously,
the average rate of profit is today lower than it was in the first half
of the 19th century).

Does this view of a new industrial revolution overthrow the classical
Marxist-Leninist conception of imperialism as the final stage of
capitalism? It does not, no more than the appearance of monopoly
capitalism overthrew the classical Marxist conception of competition
being the driving force of capitalism.

The third phase in the history of capitalism reproduces most of the
basic features of imperialism on a higher scale, just as monopoly
capitalism reproduced competition on a higher scale. But it does so in a
changed framework. Whereas “free competition” capitalism was largely
limited to a small part of the world, imperialism embraced the whole
earth. “Neocapitalism” (or late capitalism) is again limited to only
part of the world. But whereas early expanding “liberal” capitalism of
the 19th century had only to face decaying older social orders, “late”
capitalism is confronted with the formidable challenge of
anti-capitalist forces and a post-capitalist social order which enjoys
both a higher rate of growth and a much larger popular appeal to at
least two-thirds of mankind.

One can also add that during the “long period” of stagnation of
capitalist world economy (1913-1940) a great “reserve” of scientific and
technological inventions had been built up, whose large-scale productive
application was delayed as a result of the unfavorable economic
conditions prevailing during that period. The dynamic of these
inventions, accelerated by the results of the war economy boom itself,
laid the basis for a real explosion of technological innovations, which
could be widely applied under conditions of reconstruction, stepped up
capital accumulation[18] and continued expansion of arms production,
itself strongly determined by the conditions of “competition” with a
non-capitalist economy in the Soviet Union.

In any case, the key aspect of this development is to understand the
oversimplification of the assumption (of which even Lenin and Trotsky
were at moments victim of) that the structural crisis of the world
capitalist system, which undoubtedly began with the first world war and
the Russian revolution, somehow is identical with an absolute decline in
the development of productive forces. There is no trace in Marx’s
“Capital” and his mature economic thought of such an idea.

The structural crisis of the capitalist world system means that the
system begins to break up, that there is an uninterrupted chain of
social revolution erupting, some victorious and some defeated, that the
restriction of world capitalism to only parts of the world (and the
challenge which the other part represents to it) put formidable
supplementary constraints on to it, that the fundamental contradiction
between the level of development which the productive forces have
reached and the capitalist production relations, leads periodically to
big social explosions, and that thereby tile objective pre-conditions
for victorious socialist revolutions exist, historically for the whole
epoch, and conjuncturally at successive phases in various countries.
This structural crisis of the capitalist mode of production is
intertwined with the periodic crisis of overproduction, but by no means
identical or synonymous with it. And each time when a period of
revolutionary upsurge of the working class in the industrialized
imperialist countries ends in defeat, this creates a situation in which
an economic: recovery is not only possible but inevitable for the
imperialist bourgeoisie.

In other words: the basic notion here is that there are no “economic
situations without a way out” for the imperialist bourgeoisie, as Lenin
rightly stated. Capitalism cannot collapse simply out of its own inner
economic contradictions. This Kautskyist conception — which, through the
intermediary of English mechanistic “Marxists” of the Strachey type, has
exercised a deep influence on Marxist thought in Great Britain — is the
underlying assumption of much of Kidron’s misplaced critique against
_Marxist Economic Theory._ We don’t share this conception, and Marx had
nothing to with it. The only thing he showed was that the inner
contradictions of capitalism lead towards periodic economic crisis and
social explosions. The fact that even in a period of accelerated
investment and growth a tremendous inverted pyramid of monetary
inflation and personal indebtedness had to be erected to keep the system
going — a pyramid which cannot be expanded in an unlimited way — clearly
shows that _all_ these contradictions are still very much with us, like
in Marx’s time. But whether capitalism collapses or not depends on the
successful revolutionary action of the working class. And what happens
when it does not collapse depends on a variety of factors, some of which
we have just sketched.

We shall not take up Kidron’s laborious attempts at irony, accusing us
of pandering to the notions of “non-stagnating stagnation” and of
“slumpless slumps”[19]. It is very significant that in _none_ of the
passages of _Marxist Economic Theory,_ which Kidron cites as proof that
we did not “incorporate the uncomfortable fact of the mildness of
post-war recessions” into our general analysis, but continue to speak of
the “inevitable slumps” (presumably on pages 168, 171,346.347.529, etc.)
in _none_ of these passages does the word “slump” even so much as
appear! The only “inevitability” we mention in all these passages is the
inevitability of periodical downward fluctuations, of periodic declines
in output, of periodic increases in unemployment, of periodic
overproduction of commodities and excess capacity of equipment. That’s
what capitalist crisis means for Marxist economic theory. And these
continued to occur regularly, after World War II as well as before.

Kidron does not understand at all the point we made about “recessions”
and “slumps”: that the difference is purely quantitative and not
qualitative (and very often quantitative only after a certain stretch of
time; the first manifestations of a recession are very often as violent
as the first manifestations of the 1929 slump, as we statistically
proved). Recurrent recessions prove precisely that, capitalism is _not_
capable of regular, harmonious growth, is _not_ capable of avoiding
unemployment and is _not_ capable of avoiding fluctuations of income;
all this for the simple reason that it is generalized commodity
production conducted under conditions of private property (of “many
capitals”) which _inevitably_ implies irregular, spasmodic ups and downs
of investment. A mild recession is a recession, i.e., a crisis, after
all; and a million unemployed in a country like West Germany or Italy
are, after all, a million unemployed’ and not full employment. That they
don’t have the gravity of the 1929 and the 1938 slumps, we concede
willingly. But what does that prove? How about comparing them to the
pre-1929 or the pre-1913 crises of overproduction (these were, after
all, those which Marx wrote about)? What about determining their
tendency? Will they tend to become “milder” and “milder” till they fade
away? Or will they become stronger and stronger?

These matters are all connected with the very heart of Marxist economic
theory. Is it possible to avoid fluctuations while generalized commodity
production exists? Is it possible to avoid crises of overproduction
(pardon me: “recessions”) when “key choices about the deployment of
resources” are left to individual capitalists? If Kidron thinks it
isn’t, he, too, believes in the inevitability of crises of
overproduction under capitalism, and then, following his own absurd
vocabulary, he too is a believer in “slumpless slumps”. And if he
doesn’t believe in the inevitability of crises under “contemporary”
capitalism, then he can in no way hide his complete and total break with
Marxist economic theory, method, analytical categories and doctrine as a
whole. His impressionist refusal to answer these questions is, in fact,
a typical “refusal to generalize”, characteristic of vulgar economics.

 

Capitalism and “State Capitalism” — the Nature of the Soviet Economy

How does it happen that a trained and not talentless economist like
Kidron, who has also read some Marx, can make such elementary blunders,
constantly confusing use values and exchange values, physical goods and
capital, absence of slumps of the 1929 type and absence of capitalist
crisis of overproduction? The reasons obviously do not lie in his lack
of analytical ability. They lie in his desperate attempt to cling to the
myth of “state capitalism” existing in Russia, and to the need which
flows from that attempt to show somehow that there is no “basic”
difference between the functioning of “contemporary capitalism” and the
functioning of the Soviet economy. That’s why he has to slur over or
even deny fundamental aspects of capitalism and fundamental laws of
motion of the capitalist mode of production.

Ever since social-democratic opponents of the Russian October revolution
hatched the theory of “capitalism” continuing to exist in the Soviet
Union, supporters of that theory have been faced with a difficult
choice. Either they consider that Russian “capitalism” has all the basic
features of classic capitalism as analyzed by Marx, to start with
generalized commodity production, and that it also shows all the basic
contradictions of capitalism, included capitalist crisis of
overproduction and then they have a hard time discovering evidence for
this. Or they admit the obvious fact that most of these features are
absent from the Soviet economy, and they then have to contend that these
features are not “basic” to capitalism anyhow, which in the last
analysis only means exploitation of wage-labor by “accumulators”. This
then implies unavoidably that there are qualitative differences between
the functioning of capitalism as it exists in the West and the
functioning of the Soviet economy, and that “state capitalism” is a mode
of production different (i.e., corresponding to different laws of
motion) from classical private capitalism. Bordiga is the outstanding
representative of the first current, Tony Cliff of the second current.
The peculiarity of Kidron is to try to have it both ways: he intends to
eat his “state capitalist” cake and have it too!

He starts by conceding that Soviet economy is not subjected to the
tyranny of profit nor to internal competition nor to crisis (p. 35). The
explanation is that in Russia we are living under the regime of “a
single capital”. But if there is no competition, if there is only a
single capital, then, obviously; there is a “central, public arrangement
to ensure that the process will go on in an orderly, continuous and
predictable way” (Kidron’s definition of what _does not_ exist under
capitalism) and this “arrangement” is called central planning.
Obviously, too, if there is no competition, “key choices about the
deployment of resources” are not left to “individual capitals” (which do
not exist), but are centrally determined in a coherent way, and we have
continuous growth. And then, equally obviously, there is no capitalism,
because all these “arrangements” are unattainable under capitalism.

But at the same time as he concedes all this, Kidron makes a series of
statements which completely contradict this conception of the laws of
motion of capitalism not applying inside Russia. We read that “nothing
(!) in Stalinist (including post-Stalin) Russia defies analysis in terms
of Marx’s model The process of pumping out surpluses from the mass of
producers is as vulnerable in Russia to wild and random encroachments
(!) from other capitals as it is anywhere else. The people, that
organize and benefit from it, arc under as oppressive a compulsion to
fast economic growth as any similarly placed class elsewhere” (p. 34).
We wait for any substantiation of these breathtaking statements. There
is none to come. And none can come because they are based on a crude
conceptual sleight-of-hand. Here all the initial confusion between
use-values and exchange values, between accumulation of machines and
accumulation of capital, between conflicts of different social systems
and capitalist competition, come finally into their own.

Let us take for a minute the concept of a “single capital” seriously and
see where it leads us.

Inside _General Motors_ there is of course no capitalist competition
going on. The department producing car bodies does not “compete” with
the department producing gear-boxes. Capital does not “flow” from one
department to the other, when gear-box production is “more profitable”
than car body production. _General Motors_ normally can do nothing with
gear-boxes in excess of cars produced (we leave aside the marginal case
where a large corporation would actually sell parts to competitors; this
does not change anything in the logic of our reasoning). Normally, the
production of all parts is “planned” so that a maximum number of cars
can be sold profitably.

Now if there is no “market economy” inside _General Motors_
corporations; if the flow of goods between the departments of that
“single capital” is not a flow of commodities but a flow of use-values,
why then in _General Motors_ a capitalist trust, why is the final
product indeed a commodity, why are the owners of the corporation under
the economic compulsion to exploit their workers and to accumulate more
and more capital? Obviously because they have to sell their cars on a
market, in competition with other car manufacturing corporations. If the
wages in their firm go up quicker than productivity of labor, cost
prices go up and then _General Motors_ cars would be priced out of the
market. If the rate of exploitation goes down, capital accumulation goes
down, technology becomes obsolete compared to that of competitors with
higher capital accumulation, and again the firm not only would quickly
lose its share of the market, but would even be in danger of finding no
market whatsoever for its goods. It is through the fact that the final
products of _General Motors_ are commodities, have to be sold on a
market, and are therefore subject to capitalist competition, that the
inner organization of the plant which appears at first sight as “planned
economy” is subject to “wild and random encroachments from other
capitals”, and that anarchy of production, increased exploitation,
capital accumulation, periodic crisis, firing of workers, inflow and
outflow of capital from the auto branch to other branches, in brief, all
the laws of motion of capital discovered by Marx; assert themselves.

Now let us presume that through some “miracle” called the October
Revolution the workers of _General Motors_ expropriate their owners and
reorganize production in such a way that they do not have to sell any
commodities on the outside market (later, after some soul-searching,
they decide to divert 1% of their annual output for such a sale, but
this does not change anything decisively in the set-up; even if this 1%
were to be suddenly suppressed, no basic change in the organization of
their would occur).[20] Diversification of production tends to cover at
least the elementary needs of all the manpower of the firm. Would this
still be “capitalist” production? Of course not, no more than that of
the “communistic” colonies of 19th century America. Do the laws of
motion of the capitalist mode of production apply to that outfit?
Evidently not. There would be no capital accumulation, only an
accumulation of industrial equipment, produced according to plan, in the
form of use-values. There would be no flow of capital from less to more
profitable areas.[21] There would be no cyclical movement of investment,
income and output, no periodic crisis, no periodic unemployment, but
steady growth (provided the planning functions more or less adequately).

Would there be _threat_ of encroachment by capitalism? Of course there
would be such a threat; capitalism, by its very nature, is adverse to
any part of the earth and any potential market being taken out of its
grip. This threat would take the form of a threatening police action (or
a military action) to restore private property and “free enterprise” in
the domain of the collectivized outfit. It would take the form of trying
to lure away the G.M. workers, by showing them at least that elsewhere
they could enjoy a higher standard of living. These threats would,
obviously, influence the behavior of whoever administers collectivized
General Motors. Part of output would have to be diverted for arms
production, for purposes of self-defense, and there would be a powerful
incentive for technically more and more advanced arms production. Plans
would also have to be drafted (and redrafted) in order not to fall too
much behind capitalist production technique for consumer and investment
goods too (or even for overtaking them). The division of total output
inside the collectivized domain would be influenced by these challenges
and the desired response to them. This would be true, incidentally,
independently from the fact whether collectivized domain were
administered under a perfect scheme of workers control and workers
self-management, or whether it were administered by a hideous gang of
foremen and engineers, who grabbed power inside the domain in order to
reserve for themselves the cream of the output, achieving thereby a much
higher standard of living than the modest average made possible by the
given capacity of output, achieving thereby a much higher standard of
living than the modest average made possible by the given capacity of
output. And the possibility of political power and self-administration
being taken away from the workers of the plant would in its turn depend
on the degree by which general consumers needs would be satisfied (if
they were, there would be no “incentive” for anyone grabbing power in
order to satisfy consumer needs!), on the degree of political activity,
awareness and socialist consciousness of the workers (in its turn
depending at least partially on their standard of consumption, of
leisure and of culture), and on their class cohesiveness (in part a
function of the existence and leading influence of a revolutionary
organization) .

But by no stretch of imagination, and especially, by no clever word-play
(first using “wild and random encroachments” instead of pressure or
threat of encroachments; then using “encroachment” instead of
“competition for shares of a market”: and finally substituting
accumulation of capital for accumulation of use-values, could these
conditions be pressed back into the categories of Marx’s model of the
inner logic, the laws of motion and the contradictions of generalized
commodity production, i.e., of the capitalist mode of production.

So the conclusion is inescapable. There is no “single capital” in Russia
(capitalist production under “single capital” was ruled out by Marx
anyway). It is absurd to assume that capitalist production was somehow
reintroduced because of “competition on the capitalist world market”
(i.e., that the tail of 1 % of output imported from and exported to
advanced capitalist countries is wagging the dog of the Russian
economy).

And it is even methodologically wrong to assume a mechanical and
automatic identity between the fact of a country being submitted to
“encroachments” of foreign capital and the fact of that country becoming
capitalist. Only if and when these encroachments _change the internal
mode of production_ do they lead to introduction (or reintroduction) of
capitalism.

Marx made the point that India and China, although gradually drawn into
the capitalist world market, did not for several centuries become
capitalist countries (i.e., acquire a capitalist mode of production),
because of the strong resistance which the basic mode of production of
these countries continued to oppose to the “encroachments” of
international capital. And if such was the capacity of resistance of a
decadent and decaying Asiatic mode of production, surely the capacity of
resistance against encroachments by the world market of a superior mode
of production, based on collective property of the means of production
and planned economy, could be understood to be a thousand times
stronger. History proves that it has indeed been so.

 

The Meaning of the Economic Reforms in the U.S.S.R.

All these questions become even clearer if one tries to fit the current
economic reforms in Russia and Eastern Europe into this analytical
framework. If we assume, as Kidron does, that Russia is a capitalist
economy “accumulating capital” under pressure of and in competition with
the capitalist world market, then these reforms become meaningless
(indeed, any analysis of the Russian economy made by
“state-capitalists”, cf. Tony Cliff’s “_The Nature of Stalinist Russia_
” written in the fifties, completely failed to foresee anything of the
kind). There is the need to “accumulate capital”. The bureaucracy is the
“agency for accumulation”. Accumulation leads to “class struggle” like
in the West. But because there is “fascist-type dictatorship”, this can
only erupt violently (and not for reforms). That’s all they had to say.

If one starts however from the assumption that Russia’s economy is not
capitalist; that it is a specific non-capitalist mode of production,
then one has to analyze the specific contradictions of that mode of
production, and then one can foresee the specific economic and social
problems, conflicts and crisis, which will arise from these
contradictions (completely different from those of bourgeois society).
That’s what we tried to do in _Marxist Economic Theory_ and events have
shown us to be right. Indeed, the very contradictions which we laid bare
were admitted by the leading economists there and used as starting
points for the economic reforms being introduced in Eastern Europe and
the USSR since the early sixties (these reforms, be it said in passing,
will only temporarily provide solace and can in no way solve the said
contradictions, which can only be overcome by a political revolution
introducing democratically-centralized, i.e., planned, workers
management).

We cannot here reproduce the whole argument; but let us concentrate on
the main points. As we have said above, it IS simply not true that all
ruling layers (classes and castes) in history have had an urge to pump
more and more surplus product out of the producers. And it is even less
true that they all have an urge to “accumulate capital”. This “urge” is
typical only for the capitalist class, under the concrete conditions of
the capitalist mode of production (universal commodity production and
private property of the means of production, i.e., the existence of
“several capitals”, i.e., competition). Now the Soviet bureaucracy is
_not_ a capitalist class. It does _not_ manage factories under
conditions of universal commodity production. It is _not_ in the process
of competition for markets with other capitalists. _So it_ is u_nder no
economic compulsion to maximize output and under even less economic
compulsion to optimize resource utilization._ In fact, it accepts the
“tyranny of the plan!’ (as Kidron states, without seeming to understand
that this is a qualitatively different “tyranny” from that of profit)
only because It wants to keep its managerial position, as a means of
achieving the optimum standard of consumption available under the given
conditions. In other words, the _consumption desires of the bureaucracy_
(like the consumption desires of precapitalist classes) _and not the
need to maximize accumulation and output,_ are the motive force behind
bureaucratic management. And this unavoidably clashes with the inner
logic of a planned economy which calls for maximizing output[22] and
optimizing deployment of resources.

How did Stalin solve this contradiction? Essentially through two means.
On the one hand, “material consumer incentives” to the bureaucrats were
greatly increased, and were made much more meaningful in the light of
the miserable standard of living of the mass of the producers. On the
other hand, the bureaucrat was trapped in a mass of orders which he had
to fulfill, lest he lose not only his consumer privileges but also his
liberty and very possibly his life. It was tacitly understood that among
all these contradictory indicators, that of attaining or surpassing
gross output figures had the absolute priority, and that he was allowed
to disregard some other indicators to attain these. But from time to
time he was harshly reminded, through violent sanctions, that he had to
respect plan discipline as a whole, and not only parts of it.

Why did this combination of carrot and stick increasingly fail to
deliver results starting with the fifties? From the point of view of the
overall interests of the planned economy, because it had been geared
essentially to the needs of an _extensive_ industrialization (with large
reserves of land. natural resources and manpower); in which cost
calculations in relation to alternative investment projects were of less
importance; this period was over and the Soviet economy needed urgently
to grow from extensive into _intensive_ industrialization, with much
more closely calculated use of resources than before. From the point of
view of the bureaucracy as a social layer, because both the carrot and
the stick were rapidly losing their effects. The incentive effect of the
bureaucracy’s consumer privileges was dwindling, when the general
standard of life in the country rose and in fad inequality in income
declined somewhat: e.g. the salary of a director of the biggest
machine-building plant, first category, was only five times the minimum
wage of a cleaning woman, after the latest rise of minimum wages on
January 1st, 1968, instead of eight times in 1966 or ten to twelve times
under Stain. The fear of violent repression was also receding as a
result of the “liberalization” of the Khrushchev era and the general
decrease ill the use of arbitrary trials, deportation (not to say
killings etc.), against individual bureaucrats.

Looking for a way to overcome the growing contradictions between the
general needs of the planned economy and the material interests of the
individual bureaucrats (which are pure consumer interests, be it
repeated!) as the driving force of economic growth, the leaders and
ideologues of the bureaucracy gradually evolved a system of economic
reforms which would tie the income of the bureaucrats to an objective
measurement of economic performance. Instead of these privileges
depending only on the managerial position and carrying out the plan,
they would henceforth increasingly depend on the performance of the
factory the bureaucrat manages. And profit was partially “rehabilitated”
as a faithful indicator of such overall economic performance. In this
way, the bureaucracy’s ideologues thought the managers would be forced
to a higher degree of optimization in resource utilization than before.
The machine-building plant’s director we referred to above would receive
his “incentive” through bonuses tied to profit, instead of through a
very high salary.

Contrary to what superficial Maoist and semi-Maoist critiques in the
West assumed-these strange new “state capitalist” bedfellows of Kidron”!
— the reforms do not mean that capitalism is being reintroduced in he
Soviet Union. They do not mean that profit becomes the motive force of
economic growth, i.e., starts to direct investment “spontaneously” from
branches where it is lower towards branches where it is higher. No real
competition in the capitalist sense of the word (i.e., competition for
selling on an anarchic market) occurs. Means of production have not
become commodities. Rather, what has occurred is the use of a
pseudo-market to optimize resource utilization quite along the lines
which the late Oscar Lange postulated already in the thirties[23].

But do these reforms mean a smooth and rational use of the planned
economy’s resources, in order to achieve the maximum growth of output?
By no means. They only substitute one set of contradictions for another.
Income of the bureaucracy is now increasingly tied to the factory’s
“success” on the “market”. But this “success” does not depend only, or
even essentially, upon a rational utilization of given resources
available to the factory. It also, and above all, depends upon the
technology of the factory (i.e., new investment taking place) and upon a
given relationship between the “prices” the factory has to pay for what
it “buys”, the amount of manpower it has to use and its wages bill on
the one hand, and the “prices” the same factory receives for what it
“sells” on the other hand. As long as these prices, the mass and form of
investment, the amount of manpower and wages, are determined by the
plan, the bureaucrat will quickly feel cheated by the new arrangements.
He will say: “You want us to perform “optimally”, but you fix things so
from the start, that such a performance is, in fact, impossible”[24].

So the economic reforms _must_ unleash a constant tug-of-war of a new
type between the plan and the bureaucrats administering the units of
output. The old tug-of-war was essentially about allocations (the
bureaucrats systematically overestimated the factories’ needs of workers
and material, while they underevaluated the productive capacity of the
same factories). The new tug-of-war will be about power of decision. The
factory managers will demand the right to hire and fire workers as they
like. They will demand the right to “negotiate” wages (regionally,
locally, or even by branch or unit) according to “market conditions”.
They will demand the right to retain the major part of the “profit” of
“their” factory to be invested there. They will ask for a rising (and
specific) share in total investment to be realized autonomously by
themselves, inside “their” factory. They will above all demand that they
should fix the prices of the products they “sell” as they seem fit to do
(i.e., as the “market” dictates). And the “planners” will of course
stridently resent all these demands which run counter to the elementary
principles and needs of central planning.

Let us assume for a moment that the factory managers were to be
successful in their demands, and gradually conquer these supplementary
rights (this is the actual formula used today in Soviet discussion:
“increasing rights for the factory managers”). What would be the outcome
of that process? Surely, we would have to drop the inverted commas
around the words “market”, “buy” and “sell”. Surely, each factory making
its own investment, trying to establish its own prices, negotiating its
own wages, would have become an independent firm, and the market would
then “arbiter” between these firms and give birth to prices which would
no more be determined by plan, but would result from the inter-play of
market forces. Surely, in that case, capital would flow from less to
more profitable branches. It would no more be the plan, but this flow of
capital which would determine the general lines of growth of the
economy. Surely, more and more firms would then find it profitable to
export part of their goods instead of selling them in the inner market,
and would establish direct connections with foreign firms which would
increasingly also sell on the Russian market, as well as export capital
to that country. Surely, the growth of individual investment would
inevitably lead to overinvestment which in a market economy could only
be corrected through periodic crises of overproduction and unemployment
(never mind whether “mild” as recessions, or “grave” as slumps).

In that case, of course, the Soviet economy would have become a
capitalist economy, for everybody to see and acknowledge the fact, even
the dogmatic and myopic Mandel. But would it be a “state capitalist”
economy’! The whole process started because the income of the factory
manager being tied to the factory’s “profit”, the manager had received a
strong economic incentive to determine this “profit” by his own decision
(i.e., to establish control over most of the decisions on which that
profit depends). But once he actually succeeds in doing this, he has an
even stronger incentive to remain tied to “his” factory for the rest of
his life, and to transmit these “ties” to his children and family.
Imagine how cheated he would feel if, after having succeeded in making a
factory a “profitable” concern, he would then be transferred to another
factory which makes a loss (with the loss of income which this would
entail for him!). So the process could only end by the reintroduction of
private property. And when, even before this ultimate outcome, the ties
with foreign firms become stronger, villas bought on foreign coasts and
mountains, bank-accounts established in foreign banks and used for some
“profitable investment” (e.g. the purchase of foreign stocks and bonds)
would become additional stepping stones in this process.

One could say that all this is purely imaginary and only invented for
argument’s sake. But is it indeed? Hasn’t that process actually begun in
the Soviet Union? Have not the managers received the right to fire some
“excessive workers”? Has not pressure to grant them the right to “fix
their own prices” (i.e. to have them fixed by supply and demand on the
market) already started, and isn’t it referred to in the Soviet press?
Have not certain ideologues of the “managerial layer” (whose existence
is now openly admitted and whose formation and education is surrounded
with the greatest care by the leaders of the bureaucracy) claimed the
right to decide upon the closure of “unprofitable factories”? Has not
even Liberman raised his voice in favor of the enterprise becoming more
and more “self-financing”? Isn’t there already an experiment with a
whole industrial branch financing “its own” investment?[25] Haven’t the
trends towards a disintegration of planned economy begun to assert
themselves in Yugoslavia, since the “economic reforms” of 1965? Hasn’t
even an open conflict arisen between “workers self-management” (in its
distorted Yugoslav version) and “socialist market economy”, the most
“aggressive” wing of the Yugoslav factory managers openly defending the
idea that management should be freed from day-today “encroachments” by
the workers’ councils, whose functions should presumably be reduced to
one of “deciding income distribution”, e.g. to similar functions of a
capitalist firm’s general stockholders meeting? And isn’t the
possibility of this process going further and further in that direction
conceivable today, with all the social forces and contradictions
involved in it before our eyes, in broad daylight so to speak, in the
Yugoslav case?

What we deny of course is that this process could lead to “gradual” and
“imperceptible” restoration of capitalism. We do not believe that this
restoration of capitalism can be achieved “behind the backs of society”,
so to speak, in the first place behind the backs of the working class,
which is already by far the numerically strongest class in the Soviet
Union and in many other Eastern European countries. We are convinced
that the workers will put up the strongest possible resistance to such a
disintegration of the planned economy, especially when it entails a loss
of job security, reappearance of large-scale unemployment, wage
decreases and the strong increase in inequality of income[26] We are
therefore convinced that capitalism could be restored in the Soviet
Union or in any Eastern European country only after breaking the fierce
resistance of the working class. And we are likewise convinced that the
state apparatus is tied in its majority to the perseverance of social
ownership of the means of production and of planned economy, and that
its resistance would have to be broken too on the road of capitalist
restoration (that is the reason why we still call it a workers’ state,
incidentally be it a very degenerate one), nay that it will have to be
broken and shattered to pieces, and replaced by a state apparatus of
another type, geared to the defense of private property and “free
enterprise”. Given the present constellation of social forces, both
nationally and internationally, we think it very unlikely that this
resistance _could_ actually be broken under these conditions, and that
capitalism _could_ be restored either in the Soviet Union, or in
Yugoslavia, or in any other bureaucratically degenerated or deformed
workers’ state.

But the beginning of the process is here, for everybody to see. And it
reveals the inconsistencies and contradictions of the theory of “state
capitalism” in a striking way. For Kidron will have to answer two sets
of questions:

First, are all these contradictions, conflicts, trends and processes
anywhere similar or identical to the laws of motion of capitalism,
observed by Marx? Have they anything to do with what has been going on
in the West during the last 20 years? Aren’t they obviously
contradictions, conflicts and laws of motion of a mode of production
qualitatively different from capitalism? Aren’t they precisely those
conflicts between “the logic of the market” and the “logic of planning”,
which the late Preobrashensky analyzed as characteristic for the period
of transition between capitalism become socialism, which is ushered in
by the overthrow of capitalism? How could capitalism become restored
under capitalism? Would Kidron deny that the above-sketched process, if
it would unfold till its ultimate logic, would actually lead to the
replacement of one social system by another? Would he then concede that
“state capitalism” is different from “private capitalism”, exhibiting
different and specific laws of motion? But -what’s the use of calling it
then “capitalism”? And what becomes of the preposterous statement that
“nothing in Stalinist Russia defies analysis in terms of Marx’s model”?
Would it indeed not be more correct to postulate the opposite: the
_whole_ development of Stalinist Russia follows other laws than those
elucidated in Marx’s mode of capitalism-

Second; if one presumes that the process of disintegration of planned
economy proceeds till the bitter end, and that “classical” capitalism,
based upon the private ownership of the means of production, is restored
in the Soviet Union, what would Kidron call that process, and what would
be his political attitude towards it? Would it be just the change of one
form of “capitalism” into another? Would Kidron’s attitude be one of
indifference, or even of glee, “liberal capitalism” replacing a
“totalitarian” one? Would the change in the mode of production and in
the nature of the state be a historical progression or a historical
regression? If it would be a regression (and the more intelligent “state
capitalists” tend to admit that), wouldn’t Kidron then be in the
unfortunate position of having to call it a _social counter-revolution,_
and to give a positive connotation to what he calls the “ruling class”
in the Soviet Union, rehabilitating it and “defending” it against its
“reactionary enemies”? And if he were “indifferent”, how could he
reconcile this with the obvious economic and social regression
encompassed in this process? If he were even to deny this regression,
how could he reconcile this with his own admission that there reigns
today in Russia “the tyranny of the plan” and not the “tyranny of the
market”?

 

The society in transition between capitalism and socialism

The most irresponsible of Kidron’s statements is the one that denies the
existence and the very possibility of a society in transition between
capitalism and socialism. (In all fairness, one must state that Tony
Cliff does not agree with him on this point.) Calling such a society a
mere “verbal convenience” is not only in opposition to the whole body of
theory of Marx, Lenin and Trotsky and to more than a century of
experience of the revolutionary labor movement (it is not Mandel who
invented that category, after all), but also puts a question mark over
the possibility of socialist revolution anywhere in the world today, to
begin with in Britain and Western-Europe.

Kidron’s argument is again a typical example of his mechanistic and
unhistoric thought. True, he says, there can be a transition between
feudal society and capitalist society[27], because capitalism can grow
piecemeal within the interstices of feudal society. Then he goes on:
“But socialism is a total system. It cannot grow piecemeal within the
interstices of a capitalist society. How does workers’ control of
production coexist with control by a ruling class when the means of
production in dispute are one and the same? How does self-determination
and consumer sovereignty (’production for use’) coexist with the
external compulsion and blind accumulation that results from capitalist
dispersal? There may be (!) room for transitional forms in distribution,
butt at the level of production and control over production the only
possible transition is a sudden, revolutionary one” (p. 35).

The first striking feature of this argument is Kidron’s definition of
socialism. We can hardly believe our eyes: Kidron appears here as a
pupil of … Stalin! For it was Stalin who first dared to introduce into
Marxist thought the utterly revisionist and primitive notion that
socialism = workers control over the means of production from
capitalists, big and small. It is true that for Stalin, socialism equals
nationalization of these means of production, whereas Kidron, loudly
protesting, calls this a farce and claims that socialism = workers
control over production. But when the smoke has cleared from the verbal
battlefield, and all the epithets and insults are pushed out of the way,
the notion is exactly the same in both cases, and it is exactly as
wrong!

For classical Marxism, to which we continue to adhere notwithstanding
all of Kidron’s sneers, socialism means a classless society. It
therefore presupposes not only the suppression of private property of
the means of production, henceforth managed in a planned way by the
associate producers themselves, but it also calls for a level of
development of the productive forces which makes possible the withering
away of commodity production, of money, and of the state. It is
therefore a new social system having its own mode of production, its own
mode of distribution, and its own economic automatism, which constantly
reproduces basically socialist relations between men.

Now the working class is perfectly capable of overthrowing capitalism in
a single country (it did so in Russia, Yugoslavia, China, Cuba, North
Vietnam, and is busy doing so in South Vietnam right now). But it is not
capable of building a socialist society in a single country, not even in
the U.S.A. (not to speak of Britain or Western Europe). When it has
taken power and has organized a planned economy it is not able to
suppress commodity production completely because output is not yet high
enough to cover all social needs. If it tries to do this artificially,
commodity production (with some “private” monetary standard) will
re-emerge spontaneously from universal rationing, independently of the
will of the “associated producers”[28]. Commodity production will
therefore still prevail ill the realm of consumer goods. Economic
automatism will not reproduce “socialist” relationships in society;
state coercion will be necessary to correct that. And we will therefore
have a society in transition between capitalism and socialism,
characterized (like the Soviet Union) by the basic contradiction and
combination of a non-capitalist mode of production and essentially
bourgeois norms of distribution[29]. It is no more capitalism, because
there is no universal commodity production, no capitalist competition,
no capital accumulation, no laws of motion of capital. It is not yet
socialism, because there is still partial commodity production, not yet
universal production for use, there is still money, there are still
social conflicts, and there is still a state.

Kidron could object: “I admitted that there might be transitional form
in distribution, didn’t I? But what about control over production?”
Unfortunately, it is not possible to separate production and
distribution in such a mechanistic and total way. If bourgeois
distribution norms still reign, there is still some inequality of
income. If there is still inequality of income, some social tensions
subsist (the more so the more backward the country is from the outset,
or the greater this inequality), and the state instill necessary and
cannot wither away. True, if the state is administered by the workers
themselves, this role of arbiter will function in the general direction
of greater equality; if it is administered by a privileged bureaucracy,
it will arbitrate in the sense of maintaining and consolidating these
differences of income. But the inevitability of social tension and the
survival of the state correspond to the survival of precisely these
bourgeois norms of distribution, which in turn reflect precisely the
degree of development of the productive forces: insufficient for an
immediate and general introduction of free distribution of goods and
services. And the concrete way in which the economy will be managed will
again depend at least partially upon the effects which the existing
money economy and inequality of income will have on the activity and
consciousness of the producers, on their class cohesion and political
involvement, etc., etc.

 

If this is so, such a society still has the need for accumulation (not
of capital, of course, but use-values in the form of equipment, etc.).
The division of the social product between consumption and accumulation
remains a problem, creating new social tensions. Whether there is
workers control of bureaucratic management will make a lot of difference
in the way this problem is solved: but it cannot make the problem
disappear through magic. And all these problems and tensions are neither
those of a socialist society, nor those of a capitalist society, but
precisely those of a society in Transition from one to another (in the
larger historical sense of the word, like Marx and Lenin characterized
it: “the epoch of the dictatorship of the proletariat”, which is most
certainly not the epoch of socialism).

Of course accumulation will not be “blind” (it is not in Russia either).
But external compulsion will still very much be with us (except if one
assumes simultaneous revolution in the whole world), and will lead to
new distributions and allocations of the social product (not only
between consumer goods and investment goods, but also between them and
weaponry). And this will again create many problems, and increase social
tensions all around.

So a society in transition from capitalism to socialism, far from being
a mere “verbal convenience” of Mandel’s, is a basic historic category
which maintains its fundamental significance for the whole epoch of
world revolution. That’s what was built in Russia by Lenin and Trotsky.
That’s what still will subsist in the Soviet Union when the working
class will have overthrown the parasitic rule’ of the bureaucracy,
through a political revolution, and when it will have restored full
Soviet democracy. That’s what we shall have to build, when the workers
take power and establish “genuine workers control”, in any country of
the world tomorrow. That and not fully Hedged socialism and “production
for use” without commodities, money, at state and — alas — weapons.
Anybody who promises otherwise is only creating meaningless illusions
among workers, which will cause havoc and deception when reality
exposing them. “A society in transition between capitalism and socialism
(i.e., the historical epoch of the dictatorship of the proletariat,
under whatever form this may appear) doesn’t exist”, thunders Kidron. “A
society of transition between capitalism and socialism, i.e. . . .
nationalization of all means of production under workers control,
democratically planned economy, but still with commodity production of
consumer goods, with the survival of money, with foreign trade and with
a workers army the threat of strong bourgeois states subsists: that’s
the only thing we can build immediately, when we overthrow capitalism
tomorrow”, revolutionary socialist workers in Britain will answer

If Kidron wanted to be consistent —but can one ask an adherent of the
theory of “state capitalism” to be consistent’? — he would have to reply
to them: “Back with you sons of Satan! You want to entice me to build
not a society in transition between capitalism and socialism — because
such a society doesn’t exist — but state capitalism. This I will
steadfastly refuse. I will tell you that you are unable to overthrow
capitalism anywhere, anytime, as long as it is not overthrown in all
countries simultaneously, as long as long as there is compulsion to
accumulate and to manufacture weapons. For socialism can only be born
with one stroke, or it won’t be born at all”. Will Kidron dare draw this
ultimate conclusion from his irresponsible denial of the existence of a
society in transition between capitalism and socialism., and dare tell
British workers they should wait before overthrowing capitalism even if
and when conditions for this for this overthrow would be most favorable
in their country, till they can do it simultaneously with the American
and . . . Soviet Workers, lest they themselves entangled unwittingly in
the building of “state capitalism”?

 

The politics of “state capitalism”

Kidron might shrink back before this ultimate conclusion of his thinking
but it is its logical conclusion. It shows the uselessness and danger of
the theory of “state capitalism” for the working out of a revolutionary
strategy in the present world.

If one starts from the assumption that capitalism to-day reigns supreme
not only in Russia, but also in Yugoslavia, Eastern Europe, China, North
Vietnam, Cuba —an assumption, incidentally, which you won’t find a
single capitalist in the world sharing — then it follows that world
capitalism is today stronger than it ever was before in history. Then
capitalism has ushered in a new and sensational phase of universal
development of the productive forces, above all in backward countries
like Russia and China, much more impressive even than anything Marx
described for 19th century capitalism. Then Trotsky was deadly wrong
with his _Theory of Permanent Revolution_ , and his denial of any
possibility for capitalism to solve the historic tasks of the bourgeois
revolution in under developed countries. Then any suggestion that there
is a “world crisis of the capitalist system” can only be so much empty
talk.

 

In the best of cases, we would be faced with intensified international
competition between two imperialist blocs, which eventually could lead
to war, but with which revolutionists could have nothing to do. And it
then follows that there do not exist today any objective conditions ripe
for socialist revolution, anywhere in the world, As long as capitalism
continues its triumphant march forward. Only after some major breakdown
of the system (perhaps after a war?) could such a possibility arise.
Strangely enough, a consistent “state capitalist” would thus arrive at a
very similar conclusion as a pro-Moscow CPer (the pro-Peking CPers will
in good time arrive at the same conclusion too): socialist revolution is
not on the agenda anywhere just now.

The strategic conclusions which follow are concrete and very deadly.
Kidron himself has spelled them out at least for two of the three
sectors of world revolution.

In Western Europe, basing himself on his assumption of capitalism
triumphant, Kidron, as late as 1967, while recognizing that some
slowdown of growth would probably occur, saw as the only possible
strategy for the working class movement the perspective of … “mass
reformism” from below[30]. We, on the other hand, understanding, we
believe, much more correctly the structural crisis of the world
capitalist system, could make the prediction that notwithstanding the
temporary increase in the rate of growth of the Western economy in the
fifties and the early sixties, this remained a deeply crisis-ridden
system, in which periodic social explosions, which would put the
revolutionary conquest of power on the agenda, were unavoidable[31]. The
French May 1968 events have shown who has been right and who has been
wrong in that respect, and what Kidron’s analysis objectively leads to:
to furnish a theoretical apology for all those reformist and
neo-reformist tendencies in the Western labor movement — to start with
the French CP! — who all claim that no more than a defense of workers’
real wages and the like is possible today.

For the colonial and semi-colonial countries, Kidron’s medicine is an
even more bitter one. As the colonial revolution can only lead to
capitalism in one form or another-a current exercise of the British
adherents of the, “state capitalist” theory is to explain even the
cultural revolution in China by reference to the need “to step up
capital accumulation”; presumably, if tomorrow, after Mao’s death, most
of the decisions of the “cultural revolution” were reversed, the same
explanation would then be given for the reversal. We had better stop
chattering about “permanent revolution”. Anybody who comes to power
there, including through a popular uprising, can only submit himself to
the laws of competition of the world market. As these laws evidently
play against the poor countries (and poor classes), workers and poor
peasants in these countries can only expect higher burdens, nothing
else. It sounds unbelievable, but that’s exactly what Kidron has to say
about the perspectives of the Ceylon “trotskyists”[32]:

“Ceylon is poor. She is terribly dependent on the export of plantation
products, primarily tea, whose prices are steadily falling. Unless she
can break into new export markets for manufactured goods, she will
simply become poorer.

“Exporting new goods is not easy, particularly in competition with
speculators like Hong Kong, Taiwan and Singapore and it is made less
easy by Ceylon’s relatively high level of social welfare expenditure …

“If the transition is be made at all — and it is undeniable necessary
—productivity will have to be jacked up and wages held down. _There_ is
_no alterative._ All the LSSP can hope for is that the workers will make
the sacrifice willingly.

“This then is their dilemma: they are a working-class party in theory
yet much of their policy is directed at making palatable the sacrifices
they intend demanding from the workers, they are ostensibly a socialist
party, yet much of their program is concerned with making Ceylon
competitive in a capitalist world.

“It is a cruel dilemma, and one that can become only crueler as, and if,
the left-coalition implements its economic program. For as they do so
they must become increasingly isolated — foreign capital will put on the
squeeze, the coalition’s small business allies will take fright and the
anti-coalition left will nibble successfully at their working class
support” (_Socialist Worker_ , July 3, _1969-our_ emphasis).

If all this were true, one should have to draw two conclusions. One that
it is useless to try today to make a socialist revolution in Ceylon;
things could only become worse, and a socialist should limit himself to
fight for modest democratic and economic reforms, postponing
“revolution” till some better age. Second, that it would be utterly
irresponsible to condemn, not only the reformist LSSP of entering a
bourgeois coalition government, but also and above all the various
reformist CPs of supporting national bourgeois governments (as the
Brazilian, Iraqi, Persian, Indonesian CPs have done and the Indian CPs
are doing now, one knows with what magnificent results!) Because they
had no more choice than the reformist LSSP, and wasn’t it preferable,
after all, to have the capitalists do the dirty job of squeezing the
workers’ standard of living themselves, rather than do It for them under
the false signboard of “socialist revolution”?[33]

So Kidron’s politics lead to utter despair for a revolutionist. No
revolution possible in the West; no revolution possible in the South; as
for the East, insofar as the “objective conditions” are similar either
to the West (in Russia, Czechoslovakia, East Germany) or to the South
(China. Vietnam, etc.) why hope for revolution there? The only place to
withdraw, for a revolutionist, in Kidron’s universe, is to the study,
where intelligent commentary can be made about the failures of past
revolutions and perspectives of new ones, in the 21st century. The
members of “_International Socialism_ ” should ask themselves whether
that’s what they joined their group for.

No wonder that Kidron scolds us for “shifting easily” from urban workers
to “third world” peasants, to ‘’’Students as the revolutionary focus”
(p. 3:0. If world revolution is some vague prospect for a distant
future, then of course the only thing to do today would be — outside of
studying —to involve oneself with the day-to-day economic struggles of
the workers, meanwhile preaching socialism, as good social-democrats did
around 1890.

But if world revolution is seen as the main _reality_ of our epoch,
drawing larger and larger parts of mankind in its orbit; as a result of
the world crisis of the capitalist system, then the _objective shifts_
of the process-whose main epicenter _did_ pass in fact during twenty
years (1948-1968) from Western Europe to China, Vietnam, the Arab world,
Cuba, Bolivia, etc.— must be followed and evaluated with the greatest
care, and the fact that the students _did_ trigger off a general strike
and revolutionary struggles in two industrialized countries, France and
Argentina, within the same year, should be given all the importance it
merits. This does not distract from the concept that the industrial
proletariat remains, on a world scale, the decisive social force to
overthrow capitalism and build a socialist world. But it leads back to
the Leninist concept of “What is to be done?”, that a truly
revolutionary organization can only challenge Capital’s power-here on a
world scale, and not in the framework of Russia-if it succeeds in
integrating and orienting towards socialism all objectively
revolutionary demands and movements of other social layers, be it “third
world peasants” (nearly two-thirds of mankind by the way)-students in
revolt.

The inconsistencies of “state capitalism” do not stop there. The
adherents to “state capitalist” theories were at least consistent when
they refused to back North Korea and China against American imperialism
in the Korean war; why back one “imperialist camp” against the other?
Now, all of a sudden, they back North Vietnam and the South-Vietnamese
Liberation Front (the nucleus, presumably, of the ‘bureaucratic class’
which is going to extract tomorrow the last drop of surplus-value from
the South Vietnamese laborers under the “state capitalist” system they
arc busy establishing):

What has happened? Isn’t Russia “state capitalist” or “imperialist” any
more? Has China ceased to be “state capitalist”? Is the conflict no more
a conflict between two “imperialist camps”? Have the South Vietnamese
communists suddenly more “choice” than the “Tropical Trotskyists” in
Ceylon:

Could they —God forbid! — Actually lead a socialist revolution and build
a society “in transition form capitalism to socialism”, instead of state
capitalism? One can’t make head nor tail of this “logic”. Here all the
inconsistencies of the theory of “state capitalism” are revealed quite
nakedly’[34].

Let us add that Kidron’s dilemma for the Ceylon trotskyists (and
revolutionists in the backward semi-colonial countries in general, at
that) does not make much sense from an economic point of view either.
Kidron assumes that the “terrible dependence” of Ceylon on the
capitalist world market is somehow the result of that country’s poverty
and backwardness; but couldn’t it be conceived as the _origin_ rather
than the _consequence_ of that poverty? What does Ceylon (or rather the
Ceylonese capitalists and foreign plantation companies) receive in
exchange for tea, rubber and coconut exports, and what do they do with
these results of unequal exchange? Do they use it for industrializing
the country? Only to a small extent. Don’t they rather import a lot of
consumer _goods,_ to begin with food? Couldn’t most of these consumer
goods, to start with food, be produced in Ceylon itself? Isn’t there a
tremendous reserve available for this, half a million unemployed plus
all the underemployed able-bodied adult men (not to speak about the
unemployed adult women)? Shouldn’t this underemployment of the nation’s
resources be viewed as one of the main roots of underdevelopment too?
Shouldn’t the enthusiasm of the population be mobilized for these
productive purposes, rather than for having them “accept sacrifices in
their standard of living”? Couldn’t this “labor investment” under
conditions of socialist democracy (i.e., majority consensus and workers
control) lead to an increase in output, where increase in the standard
of living could go side by side with increase in investment (in fact,
isn’t that the economically _optimum_ solution, i.e., the one which
guarantees fastest economic growth)? Wouldn’t the main condition for
such a “take-off” be the expropriation of foreign and native capital and
the establishment of a state monopoly of foreign trade and isn’t the
trouble with the reformist LSSP that it can achieve this neither in
alliance with the bourgeois SLFP nor by electoral means? Couldn’t Ceylon
answer an economic blockade by Britain (if it came about) like Cuba did,
by exchanging rubber, tea and other goods for Russian, Czechoslovak and
East German industrial equipment? Couldn’t the administration of the tea
estates by, the Tamil workers, and the subsequent rise of their standard
of living, create tremendous sympathy and enthusiasm for a Ceylon
workers and peasants republic among the starving downtrodden but
politically already alert or even radicalized population of South India
and Bengal’! Couldn’t a victorious Ceylonese revolution become a
powerful factor for triggering off a revolution in India, which would be
one of the most important and far-reaching upheavals in the history of
the human race? That is the answer to Kidron’s dilemma, which any
revolutionary Marxist could have mapped out to him. If he himself hasn’t
found it, it is not because of lack of intelligence, but because the
theory of “state capitalism” makes him colorblind to the real problems
of world revolution today and their answers.

Under these circumstances, one cannot be surprised that, faced with the
accusation of “crude philosophical idealism” hurled at us by Kidron we
are not at all upset. Yes, in our view Marxism _does_ imply that
Ceylonese revolutionists have a choice today, and that “capitalist
exploitation and accumulation” does not fatally flow there from a
certain set of economic circumstances. Yes, in our view, the tragic lack
of understanding by the leadership of the Bolshevik party, in the
twenties, of the problem of bureaucratic deformation of the workers
state, and of the means to fight it till a new upsurge of world
revolution came about, was the main cause of Stalin’s conquest of power,
and not any economic fatality against which there was no avail. Yes, we
are not “economic determinists” in Kidron’s way, which is really
Kautsky’s and Otto Baeur’s tradition, excluding revolutionary party as a
determining factor of history, anywhere, any time. To be accused of
“philosophical idealism” by such a fatalist cannot but confirm us that
we are right.[35]

After all, some people, before Kidron, thought that socialists in a
backward country had no choice but to act as a benign opposition to
capitalists, because they thought that whatever one did, capitalism was
on the agenda in that country (as long as it would not have been
overthrown in all or most of the industrially advanced countries of the
world). That’s why these people were furiously opposed to the October
revolution, which they called a “voluntarist adventure”, inspired by
“crude philosophical idealism”. That’s why they proclaimed triumphantly,
as early as 1920, that facts had proven them right, and that
“capitalism” (some actually said: state capitalism) existed in that
country. The name of that country was Russia, and the people were called
Mensheviks. They are Kidron’s models and inspiration, whether he likes
it or not.

August 10, 1969
_ERNEST MANDEL_

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Endnotes

1. Michael Kidron. “_Maginot Marxism: Mandel’s Economics_ ”, in
“_International Socialism_ ”, April-May, 1969

2. Capitalism is the transformation of labor power capital into a means
of means of production into capital, which means that they have to
become commodities too.

3. “Objects for use only become commodities because they are products of
private labors, conducted independently from each other. The complex of
these private labors constitutes global labor. As the producers
establish social contact only starting with — the exchange of the
products of their labor, the specific social character of their labors
appears only through, this exchange” (Volume I, chapter I, p. 39) —“In
order that these objects may enter into relations with each other as
commodities, their guardians must place themselves in relation to one
another as persons whose will resides in these objects. . . . They must,
therefore, mutually recognize each other as private proprietors” (Volume
I, chapter II, pp. 50-51) —In the existence of the product as commodity,
determined historical conditions are embedded. In order to become a
commodity, the product couldn’t be produced as means of immediate
subsistence for the producer himself. If we would have pursued our
investigation and asked: ’Under what conditions do all or even the
majority of products take the form of commodities’!’, we would have
discovered that this happens only on the basis of a very specific mode
of production, the capitalist one” (Volume I, chapter IV. p. 132) — The
transformation of a sum of money in means of production and labor power
is the first movement which a quantity of value passes through, if it
has to function as capital. This takes place on the market, in the
circulation sphere. The second phase of the movement, the production
process, is finished as soon as the means of production are transformed
into commodities, whose value is greater than the value of their
component parts, and thus contains the advanced capital plus surplus
value. These commodities must then be thrown back into the circulation
sphere” (Volume I, 7th part, preface to chapter XXI, p. 527). All
references are to the German edition of “Das Kapital” of Karl Marx,
edited by Engels _(9th_ printing, Hamburg, Otto Mcissncrs Verlag 1921),
and have been translated by us.

4. “This absolute drive (Trieb) of enriching himself, this passionate
chasing after value, is common to both the capitalist and the hoarder,
but while the hoarder is but a mad capitalist, the capitalist is a
rational hoarder. The indefatigable increase of value, which the hoarder
tries to attain through salvaging money out of circulation, the more
intelligent capitalist realizes it by throwing money again and again
into circulation” (Volume I, chapter 4, p. 116) — “Commodity production
presupposes commodity circulation, and commodity circulation presupposes
the representation of commodities as money, monetary circulation; the
duplication of commodities in commodities and money is a law of the
appearance of products as commodities. In the same way capitalist
commodity production presupposes — from a social as well as from an
individual point of view — capital in monetary form or monetary capital
as _primus motor_ for each new beginning business, and as a continuous
motor. … The whole advanced value _of_ capital, i.e., all component
parts of capital, which are composed of commodities, labor power, labor
means and productive material, must constantly be bought by money and
bought again. What is true here for individual capital, is also true for
social capital, which can function only in the form of many individual
capitals” (Volume II, chapter 18, p. 328) —“Money is the form in which
each individual capital (abstraction made of credit) must appear, in
order to transform itself into productive capital, this follows from the
nature of capitalist production itself, in general from commodity
production” (ibidem, p. 332, for source, see note 3).

5. “Capital exists and can only exist as many capitals, and its
self-determination appears therefore as interaction of these many
capitals on each other,” (p. 317) — the concept of capital implies, that
the objective conditions of and — and these are its own products-become
embodied in confrontation with labor (literally: take up a personality
in confrontation with labor. E.M.), or, which is the same, that they are
posed as property of a personality alien to the worker. The concept of
capital implies that of the capitalist” (p. 412) — Karl Marx:
“_Grundrisse der Krillk der pollitischen Oekonomie_ , (Rohcntwurf)
1857-1858”. DietzVerlag, Berlin 1953. Our own translation.

6. “The specific economic form, in which unpaid surplus labor is pumped
from the direct producers, determines the conditions of domination and
submission (Knechtschaft) as they emerge directly from production
itself, and react in its turn in a determining way upon production”
(Volume HI. chapter 47, p. 324 of “_Das Kapital_ ”, source as in note
3).

7. Marx made the point, in several parts of “Capital”, and in “Theories
of surplus-value”, that real wages are higher in the capitalist
countries with higher productivity of labour than in the less developed
capitalist countries. As for Marx the réserve army of labour is the
regulator of wages, this implies that there is no absolute decline of
labour foreseen by Marx, when capitalist industrialization unfolds. The
movements of accumulation of capital can produce several results:
absolute increase of labour accompanied by relative increase (in
comparison to the mass of production and the mass of capital); absolute
increase accompanied by relative decline; and absolute decline
accompanied by relative decline. The first case (which implies a decline
in social productivity of labour) is exceptional under conditions of
industrial capitalism, and so is the third one, characteristic for
periods of primitive accumulation of capital; the second case is the
more common one.

8. Karl Marx, _Theorien über den Mehrwert_, 2er Band, pp. 267-8 (2nd
edition by Kautsky, Stuttgart, Dietz Verlag 1910).

9. Karl Marx, _Das Kapital_, Volume III, chapter 15, pp. 236-7 in the
edition indicated in note 3.

10. There is of course one peculiarity of arms production which we
stressed in “Marxist Economic Theory”: the fact that its products do not
enter the enlarged _reproduction_ process, as they are neither means of
production nor means of consumption, and reconstitute neither constant
capital nor labour power. But capital invested in the arms sector is
part of total social capital; its profits enter the accumulation
process, exactly like any other capital; and its own organic composition
of capital enters in the determination of organic composition of global
social capital, hence in the determination of the average rate of
profits exactly like any other capital.
  In his book “Western Capitalism since the War” (Weidenfeld & Nicolson,
London 1968, pp. 46-7), basing himself on writings of von Bortkiewicz
and Sraffa, Kidron tries to explain the “drain” nature of arms
production by equating them to “luxury goods”. He forgets that by the
Marxist definition of luxury goods, these are bought by the
_non-accumulated_ part of surplus-value. So what we have here is a
perfect _petitio principis_. If the non-accumulated part of
surplus-value grows, accumulations slows down (and, with it) the effects
of all laws flowing from increased accumulation: that's what he wanted
to prove from the start. But is arms production indeed paid for by the
“non-accumulated” part of surplus-value? What interest has the
capitalist class in suddenly slowing down accumulation for a quarter of
a century? Has arms production actually resulted in a slowdown, or has
it rather led to a speed-up of accumulation? And if it has resulted in a
speed-up, how can one then present arms as “luxury products”? These
questions show that Kidron's analysis of arms production does not hold
water.

11. This Kidron does not want to admit, because he labours under the
impression that there exists not a plethora but a scarcity of capital.
The “proof” he produces is the high rate of interest, i.e., high demand
for money capital. If conjunctural factors — as those which exist in the
USA in 1968-9 — are abstracted from the general rise of interest rates
during the last decade is a result of inflation and not of scarcity of
capital. When secular inflation—which Kidron could have linked to the
weight of arms production, among other things—becomes a permanent
feature of the economy, the interest rate is composed of two factors:
the “price” of loaning money capital plus an insurance premium to offset
annual losses of purchasing power of the currency. When this premium is
evaluated at 3%, then the “price” for loaning money capital is much
lower than it appears to be. Evidence for the plethora of capital can be
found (1) in the move­ment of capital export from the main imperialist
powers, which is today stronger than ever before; (2) in the high rate
of self-financing; one of the striking changes of today's monopoly
capital as compared to monopoly capital in Hilferding's and Lenin's
description (a change which we noted and explained in “Marxist Economic
Theory”). Incidentally: inflation can increase the demand for _money
capital_ side by side with the existing plethora of productive capital.
As capitalists big and small don't want to hold cash, they buy up all
kinds of “real values”, and have an interest to do this on credit as far
as possible. Thus inflation creates credit expansion, which in turn
feeds inflation. Whether this leads to a scarcity of productive capital
can be studied in the annual reports of the big corporations. Do they
have difficulties in selling stocks and bonds? Can't they finance
important expansion projects due to lack of capital, etc., etc.? Posing
the question is answering it. 'I he excess productive capacity in key
sectors of industry is the teal basis of this plethora of capital.

12. The figures 1869-1919 from “Historical statistics of the USA. from
colonial times till 1957”; the figures 1919-1964 from “Long Term
economic growth 1860-1965 (US Department of Commerce, Washington 1966)”

13. In “Marxist Economic Theory” we have clearly indicated the
counteracting, tendencies, which slow down and, momentarily, even
reverse the tendency for the average rate of profit to decline.

14. Cf. Baran-Sweezy: _Monopoly Capital_ , pp. 372-378, _Monthly Review
Press_ , 1966, New York.

15. We have already indicated elsewhere a very telling example: when the
Mobutu regime of Congo nationalized the Union Miniere du Haut-Katanga
and proposed to pay compensation on the basis of the net book value of
assets, the gentlemen concerned cried out like wounded animals: “But our
assets are worth three times as much. . . .”

16. West German figures “_Zeitschrift fár allgemeine und textile
Marktwirtschaft_ ”, Heft 2, 1968-The British figures are not completely
comparable, because till 1965 they express the relation between net
profits (gross profits less depreciation and taxes) and net assets,
whereas the post _1965_ figures deduct financial charges too from gross
profits. The difference is however less than 1 %, and therefore cannot
change the general trend.

17. See especially “_The Economics of Neo-Capitalism_ ”, published in
the “_Socialist Register_ ”, 1964, London, Merlin Press.

18. Stepped up capital accumulation can be explained in Germany, Italy
and Japan, the three countries with the highest rate of growth for the
period 1950-1965 among the major imperialist powers, essentially as a
result of a sudden upward push in the rate of surplus value.
Reconstruction of the ruined economy increased profit and productivity
of labor rapidly, whereas wages lagged behind, as a result of the large
surplus of labor (from Japanese and Italian agriculture on the one hand,
the strong influx of East German refugees on the other hand).

19. Kidron denies that there has been a decline of world trade in
relation to total industrial production, and states that “trade in
manufactures has … gone up twice the rate of output since 1948” (p. 34).
He forgets that there was a -tremendous drop in the relation: trade in
manufacturers/output of manufacturers for the capitalist countries after
the 1929 slump; that the pre-1929 relation was reached again only in
1965; that the pre-1929 relation was in itself lower than the 1913
relation; and that the 1965 figures are strongly inflated as a result of
the expansion of trade inside the European Common Market (which, at
least partially, resembles the -trade inside the United States more than
international trade). A tendency which verifies itself for more than
half a century is surely a historical tendency, even if it is reversed
for four years.

20. Imports from capitalist countries fell from 0.7% of the Soviet
Union’s national income in 1940 to 0.5’)(, in 1950, after that slowly to
rise to 1.2% of the national income in _1959_ and 1.5% in 1964. These
figures don’t tell the whole story though, for a large part of these
imports come from semi-colonial countries which have an average
productivity of labor much lower than that of the Soviet Union and can
therefore neither “encroach” nor “wound” anything inside the Soviet
economy. Imports from advanced capitalist countries have till now
remained consistently lower than 1% of the Soviet Union’s national
income.

21. Kidron alleges that the planners ensure growth by a flow from
low-productivity to high-productivity sectors, and equates this with the
flow of capital from sectors with low profits to sectors with high
profits. He seems to forget that in a capitalist economy, it is not
physical productivity of labor, but financial profitability of capital
(through the prism of the market) which directs the now of resources
from one sector to another — and that both parameters by no means
automatically coincide. Unwittingly he has thereby stressed another
qualitative difference between the Soviet economy and a capitalist
economy, instead of “discovering” a _simile._ Just in passing: doesn’t
Kidron believe that in a socialized, or even a socialist economy,
resources will also have to flow from low-productivity to
high-productivity sectors, inasmuch as economic growth is still needed?
Doesn’t this indicate the basic similarity between the Soviet economy
and any economy in the epoch of the dictatorship of the proletariat,
after the overthrow of capitalism, in whatever part of the world this
occurs?

22. Not, of course, maximizing accumulation. We showed in “_Marxist
Economic Theory_ ” that the Maximum rate of accumulation never leads to
the fastest rate of growth, also some “fresh” thinking which escapes
Kidron’s attention.

23. Cf. Oscar Lange and Fred M. Taylor: “_On the Economic Theory of
Socialism_ ”.

24. The economic _rationale_ of central planning as against “individual
profitability” of the factory lies in the fact that the optimum
combination of national (or international) resources gives a higher
economic result (whether counted in net revenue or in economy of
time-time) than the sum total of the optima achieved on a factory level.

25. A few recent Soviet articles referring to these debates can here be
mentioned: V. Komin: “_Economic Reforms and Tasks in Further Improving
Price Formation_ ”, in “_Planovoie Khoziaistvo_ ”, 1968 nr. 4; v,
Lisitsyn and G. Popov: “_On administrative cadres_ ”, in “_Planovoie
Khoziaistvo”,_ 1968, nr. 5; E. G. Liberman and Z. Zhitnitsky: “_Economic
and Administrative Methods of Managing the Economy_ ”, in “_Planovoje
Khoziaistvo”,_ 1968, nr. 1. etc.

26. Cf. The outcry and near-open revolt of the Yugoslav workers since
1968 against the results of the “economic reforms”, especially in the
form of increased unemployment, increased inequality of income and
increased encroachments by managing bodies on, the workers’ rights.

27. In fact, there have been “transitional societies” between all major
stages of man’s history. Cf. George Novack’s excellent article in the
November-December 1968 issue of “_International Socialist Review_ ”.

28. In “Marxist Economic Theory” we analyzed for the first ,time (except
for the contribution by Preobrashensky, essentially geared however to
the problems of an underdeveloped agrarian country) the concrete process
of withering away of commodity production, in the course of building a
socialist economy. One would have expected some comments of Kidron’s on
this example of “fresh exploration”.

29. Kidron eagerly picks up our remarks about unsold stocks in the
Soviet Union to show that overproduction, after all, exists in that
country. He doesn’t understand that from a _partial_ survival of
commodity production, _partial_ overproduction would emerge inevitably,
as we correctly predicted already in the fifties, but that, the whole
difference between capitalism on the one hand, and petty commodity
production or society in transition between capitalism and socialism on
the other hand, lies precisely herein, that in the first case,
generalized commodity production leads “by natural law” to generalized
overproduction, i.e., to periodic decreases in investment, in income, in
output and in employment in the economy as a whole, whereas under
partial commodity production this is not the case, no more in medieval
Italy than in today’s Russia. Here notwithstanding unsaleable stocks in
various sectors of consumer goods, global investment, income, output and
employment don’t interrupt their continuous growth. Kidron has again,
unwittingly, clarified a major qualitative difference of Soviet economy
and of capitalism, instead of the simile he thought to have discovered.

30. Michael Kidron: “_Western Capitalism since the War_ ”, pp. 147-148
Kidron’s prescription was based upon the assumption of permanent full
employment. Once this is eroded, the resistance of workers of individual
factories or firms against the increasingly centralized determination of
real wages has no chance of success.

31. See our article: “_Une strategie socialiste pour 1’Europe
capitaliste_ ”, in “_Revue. internationale du Socialisme_ ”, No.9,
mai-juin 1965.

32. Kidron should have been at least objective enough to tell his
readers that after entering a coalition government with the bourgeoisie,
the reformist LSSP was expelled by the Fourth International, while a
minority, the LSSP(R) — which has the secretary of the strongest Ceylon
trade union in its ranks-maintains the continuity of Revolutionary
Marxism, i.e., Trotskyism, in the island.

33. Incidentally, this conception equals a rehabilitation of Stalin too.
The poor fellow had -obviously no choice-no more than the reformist
LSSP-but to industrialize Russia at the expense of the workers’
standards of living. And the alternative program of Trotsky’s Left
Opposition’? So much “philosophical dealism”, undoubtedly….

34. We could continue the tale. The same issued of “_International
Socialism_ ” which publishes Kidron’s “article contains an excellent
report by Ibrahim Ali, which end; with the following sentence: “Only a
revolutionary and internationalist solution is capable, not only of
solving the Palestine problem, but all other problems of social and
national emancipation in the region”. We fully agree. But let Kidron
explain why “developed Arabs” can solve all (!) their social problems
through a socialist revolution, while “underdeveloped Ceylonese” cannot.
Let the editors of “_International Socialism_ ” explain why what is true
for the Arab revolution, Eastern sector, was not applicable to the Arab
revolution, Western sector (i.e., the Algerian revolution). Wouldn’t it
then have been necessary to give the Algerian armed struggle against
French imperialism the same kind of critical support “_International
Socialism_ ” is giving today the Palestinian guerillas? And wouldn’t it
have been necessary to try and push the Algerian revolution forward to a
socialist revolution, exactly like Ibrahim Ali proposes today to the
Palestinians’!

35. Even on this very minor question Kidron cannot keep his categories
clear. "Philosophical idealism" is a doctrine which affirms the primacy
of spirit (mind) over matter, the first creating the second. When we say
that the individual unconscious still harbors echoes from the "communist
part" of 7000 years ago, we don't imply thereby that instincts or ideas
"create" material conditions; wc simply assume that they can linger DB
after the material conditions which gave birth to thcm have disappeared.
This statement has therefore nothing to do with either philosophical or
historical idealism, but is an elementary truth of historical
materialism, conceived in a dialectical way. Doesn't Kidron know that
the peculiar ideas of the Catholic Churcb, born out of material
conditions of feudalism, still have a powerful impact a thousand years
after their formulation? Doesn't he know that superstitions born from
material conditions which have disappeared for many more centuries also
linger on? Why is it then so difficult to conceive that some of the
elementary customs of social solidarity and cooperation, born under
tribal communism, and maintained in the village community, could still
strongly affirm themselves today? Perhaps because Kidron's way of
thinking is narrowly mechanistic and based upon vulgar determinism,
where everything flows automatically from economic fatality?

 

Top of the page

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Last updated on 3 January 2008

Save
